













































2

The Initial Coin Offering (“ICO”) project presented by the company DomRaider is an 
unregulated fundraising operation. It poses several risks to buyers, in particular, that 
of losing all amounts traded for tokens issued by DomRaider. 

Only people who are fully aware of these risks should participate in the ICO. Note 
also that the ICO excludes certain groups of people such as consumers and “U.S. 
Person” (within the meaning of “Regulation S” of the Securities Act 1933 in U.S. law), 
Canadian and Singapore citizen”.

Advance warning

An introduction to Drop Catching

Presently, there are close to 330 million active domain names throughout  
the world
(see: https://investor.verisign.com/releasedetail.cfm?releaseid=1015020).

They are divided into approximately 2,500 domain name extensions or TLDs (Top-Level 
Domains). ICANN (The Internet Corporation for Assigned Names and Numbers), the non-
profit regulatory organization, has delegated their management to different registries 
throughout the world, including:

The secondary market for domain names

• 300 generic domain name extensions (.com, .net, .org,….)
• 260 country code domain name extensions (.cn, .de, .co.uk, .fr,….)
• 1,930 new domain name extensions (.club, .xyz, .global,….) 
        created in 2012 by ICANN and launched since 2014.



3

The worldwide market has been driven by new gTLDs (Generic Top-Level Domains:  
which correspond to extensions such as .com, .net, etc…) wich grew by 6.8% in 2017.

‘S

300

250

200

150

100

50

0

400

350

2014 2015 2016

124

119

35

4

141

127

36

11

141

131

38

28

DISTRIBUTION OF THE DOMAIN NAMES IN MILLIONS

ccTLD’s .com Other historical TLD’s nTLD



4

Nevertheless, a significant number of transactions operated in this market are not made 
public because they often include non-disclosure agreements.
Thus, the secondary market for domain names was officially worth $500 million in 2016, 
but is estimated that in reality it was maybe worth up to 5 times more, in other words,  
$2.5 billion.

These examples date from the beginning of 2017, and demonstrate that the market is not 
showing any signs of slowing down:

Fly.com: US $2,89 m
Freedom.com: US $2 m

01.com: US $1,8 m
20.com: US $1,75 m

The domain name industry is today known for the spectacular transactions which are 

regularly operated on the secondary market, with some of the more notable examples below:

• Business.com: US$ 345m
• LasVegas.com: US$ 90m 
• CarInsurance.com: US$ 49,7m
• Insurance.com: US$ 35,6m
• VacationRentals.com: US$ 35m
• PrivateJet.com: US$ 30,1m
• Internet.com: US$ 18m
• Insure.com: US$ 16m
• Sex.com: US$ 14m
• IRS.com: US$ 12.5m

•  Hotels.com: US$ 11m
•  Fund.com: US$ 9,9m
• Porno.com: US$ 8,8m
• FB.com: US$ 8,5m
• RealEstate.com: US$ 8,2m
• We.com: US$ 8m
• Beer.com: US$ 7m
• Z.com: US$ 6,7m
• Israel.com: US$ 5,8m
• Casino.com &Slots.com: US$ 5,5m
 

EVOLUTION DU NOMBRE DE NOMS DE DOMAINE DANS LES nTLD*

35 000

30 000

25 000

20 000

15 000

10 000

5 000

0

Ja
n-1

4

Ma
rch

-14

Ma
y -

14

Ju
ly 

-14

Se
pt 

-14

No
v -

14

Ma
rch

-15

Ma
y -

15

Ju
ly 

-15

Se
pt 

-15

Ja
n-1

5

Ma
rch

-16

Ma
y -

16

Ju
ly 

-16

Se
pt 

-16

Ja
n-1

6

Ma
rch

-17

Ja
n-1

7

No
v -

16

No
v -

15

Report ICANN & nTLDstats.com*

EVOLUTION OF THE NUMBER OF DOMAIN NAMES IN THEM nTLD*



5

The sudden rise in prices has raised the barrier to entry for new domain name investors. 
This has contributed to the emergence of a business which up to recently was under the 
radar: drop catching.
Also called ‘domain sniping’, ‘backorder’ or even ‘snap’, this practice consists of registering 
an expired domain name as soon as it becomes available.

Indeed, when a person or entity registers a domain name, he, she or it becomes the holder, 
for an unlimited duration, as long as the annual renewal fees are paid. Nevertheless, when 
a registrant no longer renews the said domain name, the latter enters into an expiration 
process.

Catching expired domain names

Materializing this status as a digital asset, the average unit value of domain name 
transactions continues to increase.

Taking advantage of the very low prices of the less well-known domain name extensions, 
the number of transactions has exploded. Over the past 5 years, there has been no fewer 
than 570,000 transactions, with more than 150,000 in 2016 alone.

(see: https://namebio.com/ & http://dnpric.es/).

Today, domain names have taken on the status of true digital assets: thus, more than 120 
transactions worth more than US$ 100,000 were made in 2016. This has led to the arrival 
of new, important investors. In particular, the Asian domain name market has grown 
exponentially these past few years. Thus, in 2016, 50% of the largest transactions were 
made by Chinese investors.

(see: https://namecorp.com/china-the-new-king-of-domains/).

If the .com domain extension continues to be the reference and generates the largest 
transactions, in the past few years we have seen increasing interest in country code (.fr, 
.eu, .london…) or theme based (.loan, .men, .tech…) domain extensions. This attraction 
has been boosted by liberalization of domain name extensions which has given access 
to domain extensions which were previously reserved for residents of the countries in 
question.



6

On average, 1% of the 330 million domain names activated in the world are dropped 
in this manner, in other words, the equivalent of 100,000 drops per day.
Even though 99% of them are of little interest, the remaining 1% are real treasures.

DOMAIN NAME
LIFE CYCLE

0 - 45 days
AUTO RENEW / GRACE PERIOD

1 - 10 years

Expiration date

Creation date

REGISTRATIONFirst come / First served
AVAILABLE

DOMRAIDER
ACTIVITY

5 days
PENDING DELETE

30 days

REDEMPTION
PERIOD

1st stage
The first stage is the Redemption Grace Period (RGP). During this period, the 

domain name is deactivated, but its registrant still retains the possibility 
to reactivate it by paying the reactivation fees. This period, which varies 

depending on the registry, lasts approximately 1 to 3 months.

2nd stage
The second stage only lasts for a few days and corresponds to the period 
in which the domain name is dropped. The domain name is finally deleted 
and can be reserved by any one or any entity, similarly to a new domain 

name.



7

Buyers throughout the world are searching for certain domain names for diverse 
reasons:

• Historical SEO (Search Engine Optimization):  
domain names which previously had a lot of links 
pointing to their websites (backlinks) rediscover 
their ‘spark’ when they are restored. Natural 
referencing companies cannot get enough of them 
as they improve their positions in search engines or 
are useful for marketing links.

• Traffic: a lot of domain names immediately 
generate a lot of traffic (sometimes several tens of 
thousands of hits per day) when they are restored. 
Visitors can come from bookmarks, links or even 
social content. They are popular with marketing 
agencies who associate them, for example, with 
advertising or by affiliation.

• Rarity: rare, short, generic or even numerical 
domain names are extremely prized by domainers 
who then negotiate them on the international 
market places.

• Digital identity: trademark owners, company 
names, or family names, which or who could not 
initially reserve their names monitor drops very 
closely in order to get catch the domain name 
which corresponds to them.



8

We have a three-pronged drop catching process:

1. QUALIFY 3. CATCH2. PRE-ORDER

• Qualification: 

we identify in each registry any do-

main name currently in the RGP 

phase. Then, for each one of them, 

we collect a series of third-party in-

dicators (Google, Ahrefs, Majestic, 

Webarchive, Moz, Alexa…) which we 

then aggregate in the form of meta 

scores to reflect the potential value 

of each domain name.

• Preorder: 

the domain names which have been 

qualified are then indexed on our 

site. Our customers can thus freely 

consult them, carry out searches and 

sort them. Once they have made their 

choice, they can preorder the domain 

names which interest them.

• Catch:  

we monitor the preordered domain 

names and attempt to catch them 

as soon as they arrive in their drop 

period. Once the domain name is 

secured, we immediately deliver it to 

the customer which had preordered 

it, as long as it was the only one which 

had done so. If at least 2 customers 

had preordered the same domain 

name, it is then put to auction for a 

period of 7 days.

UNDERSTAND THE



9

Of course, the main difficulty is to successfully catch the preordered domain names. 
The rule of thumb is first come, first served. In other words, only the very first reservation 
request for a domain name just after it has been dropped shall be the winning tender.

The difficulty is increased because it is extremely difficult to ascertain the exact moment when 
a domain name is going to be dropped. The registries randomly stagger drops in timeslots 
which can last from several minutes to several days.

The level of competition is such that a 
domain name is general caught in a few 
hundredths of a second. 
At that type of speed, manual attempts to 
reserve them are doomed to failure.
In today’s climate, in order to be competitive 
and to have a chance you must obtain 
accreditations from the domain name 
registrars in order to have a direct connection 
with the registration servers. We then exploit 
these connections with bots which we 
create specifically for these type of tasks, in 
accordance with each registry’s specific rules 
and regulations.

For a long time, drop catching was considered 
as a marginal and parasite practice by the 
registries, but it has recently acquired true 
legitimacy and recognition.

One of the most striking examples of this was when DENIC, the official German registry 
of the .de domain name extension (the largest registry in Europe with 16 million active 
domain names, and the 3rd largest domain name extension worldwide behind .com and 
.cn) formalized the practice of drop catching. In May 2016, DENIC launched RRI Rush, a 
specific commercial offer for drop catching operators, thus regulating the practice. It was an 
immediate success. RRI Rush has already generated additional annual income of more than 
€5 million for the registry. France followed suit in December 2016. Thanks to this impetus, a 
large number of registries throughout the world are also preparing to regulate drop catching.



10

In its new ‘recognized’ form, there are only a few dozen worldwide operators in this market. 
They share in a very fragmented manner the different domain name extensions in often 
limited geographical zones. There is still no common multi domain name extension offer.

This fragmentation can be explained by the fact that each registry has its own specific 
domain name drop rules. Though it is true that there is a standard communication protocol 
(EPP: Extensible Provisioning Protocol) between the registries and the registration offices, 
it has yet to be universally applied and does not integrate the needs of the drop catching 
business. Furthermore, the rules are not often published by the registries. You therefore 
need to establish them by retro engineering, by putting into place observation cycles and 
implementing permanent tests. Thus, drop catching management for each new registry 
involves a significant amount of adaptation work. This explains why the initial drop catchers 
often chose to focus on one single domain name extension.

ICANN has not yet positioned itself on the issue but, in the meantime, the key players in the 
market have already openly multiplied their accreditations, a vital prerequisite for obtaining 
the best performances. One of them currently has 1,250 accreditations, a 31% increase from 
2016, or in other words, an annual budget of more than $6 million just for these accreditations.



11

The recovery rate obtained by drop catchers in comparison to their competitors 
depends on 2 key factors:

• The effectiveness of the algorithm
• The number of connections to the registry server

A ‘Winner takes it all’ market

Each accredited registration office has a limited number of creation requests that it can 
send. The only way to exceed this ceiling is to multiply the connections and therefore the 
accreditations.

This phenomenon dramatically increases fixed costs and requires operators to have a 
sufficiently high business volume to cover these additional costs.

The bigger a drop catcher’s budget the more it can subscribe to a significant number of new 
connections or accreditations. Therefore, it will have a more successful reservation rate and 
therefore more satisfied customers. With an increasing number of customers, the auction 
price will be positively impacted, thus improving the available budget.

This virtuous circle is a significant barrier to entry for any newcomers wishing to enter the 
market once it becomes mature.



12

Founded by Tristan Colombet in 2013, DomRaider today offers the best service for reserving 
dropped domain names. We offer a permanent choice from hundreds of thousands of 
domain names on the verge of being dropped.
Each domain name has been qualified in order to provide the most pertinent criteria for 
analyzing its value. 

DomRaider today

We offer our customers every type of administration option for their domain names, 
redirections, DNS (Domain Name System) entry management,…

In order to offer the best recovery rate in the market for the majority of the domain name 
extensions that we cover, we rely on 4 years of internal research and development. 
We have fine-tuned an innovative and unique technological solution thanks to an 
architecture designed to be universal. We are thus capable of integrating new domain 
name extensions and updating our capture algorithms much more quickly.



13

Supported by the stunning growth of our sales, our team has tripled in size in one 
year, and we now have 30 people working in 3 countries, with the recent opening of 
offices in Montreal and London adding to our international coverage.

Our key points

We have carried out more than 20,000 transactions and have prestigious customers such 
as Warner Music Group, the French National Education Ministry, Axa, the French National 
Olympic and Sports Committee, and the French weather forecast organization, Météo 
France.

We have received accreditations for 27 domain name extensions from international 
registries (at, be, biz, ca, cc, ch, co, co.uk, com, cz, de, es, eu, fr, info, io, it, me, net, nl, nu, 
org, pl, se, tv, uk, us) as well as that of ICANN, the worldwide regulatory authority for 330 
million domain names. We are already the drop catcher which covers the most domain 
name extensions in the world.

We have become the European leader in less than 4 years and broke even in 2016.

Supported by the Inovaa and Eefficiency investment funds, the BPI France public bank, the 
Crédit Agricole, Banque Populaire and CIC private banks, we have € 3.5 million in financing.



The blockchain shift

Blockchain
Introduction

Smart contracts

Since 2015, the “blockchain” phenomenon, created in 2009 and stemming from 

Bitcoin, has received a lot of media hype with promises of significant changes in 

the relations between private individuals, organizations or states.

The term blockchain refers to a structure of chained data, produced in a 

chronological manner within a decentralized network and according to consensus 

rules defined in a protocol. Each distributed registry protocol produces its own 

blockchain (data) which represents the history of the network’s statuses. This 

medium resembles that of a public registry, it is replicated between users and 

validators.

When a block is created, the validators (often called ‘miners’) lock the information 

it contains via cryptographic transactions and include a reference to the previous 

block (block chaining). Secure cryptographic hashing insures the integrity of 

blocks and prevent modification of data inside blocks without invalidating all 

the later blocks. The whole chain of blocks is subject to strict consensus rules 

(Proof-of-Stake or Proof-of-Work mechanisms) designed to make it extremely 

costly or difficult to alter the events or transactions stored in the blockchain.   

 

By extension, the term blockchain, though it only represents the data structure 

aspect, can refer to all the components and cryptographic tools implemented in 

this distributed computer protocol.

A Smart Contract is by definition a protocol drawn up on the basis of promises 

between several parties. Well  before  today’s distributed automatically executed 

Ethereum scripts, it  existed in traditional contracts in the form of conditional 

execution clauses. 

The nature of the Smart Contract is linked to the type of registry protocol it is 

applied to. Thus, in Ethereum (https://www.ethereum.org/), the Smart Contracts 
are computerized scripts spread out over the different nodes of the registry’s 

protocol network, and therefore the execution result is also subject to consensus 

between the nodes. Thus, the result of a Smart Contract calculation or Smart 

Contract transaction is deemed to be reliable and difficult to falsify.

Though, in theory only applicable in cyberspace, certain Smart Contracts can 

model contractual clauses, and certain jurisdictions, for example, the state of 

Delaware in the USA, are working on their legal recognition.

14



15 The ‘trust’ revolution or trust 
via proof.

When certain criteria are grouped together, the blockchain 
can become a medium which makes it possible to create trust 
between several players from different entities. The trust which is 
thus established is intrinsically linked to the rules of its protocol, 
its architecture, as well as the players’ ecosystem.
It is therefore interesting to note that this is not just about 
technology but also about governance and a community of 
users which adhere to the rules of the protocol.

Classification

The existing platforms, can be divided between:
• Public networks and private networks
• Permissionless networks and permissioned networks

These two criteria can be combined. Thus, there are public 
permissionless (e.g. Bitcoin, Ethereum), public permissioned 
(Ripple), private permissioned (Ethereum private, Hyperledger 
Fabric) networks.



16 Blockchains and domain names

At present, the world of domain names is still highly centralized due to ICANN’s exclusive 
control of the DNS root, and therefore of global domain name rules of governance. 

In the past, a few unsuccessful attempts have been made to create an open DNS, such as Open 
NIC, but the next big development appears to be the decentralized ecosystem. The number 
of initiatives in this regard has in fact multiplied recently. Below are the most significant:  

• Namecoin is a derived open source (fork) Bitcoin technology that uses, amongst other 
things, the addition of 2 new OP_CODEs (elementary operation of bitcoin script language), 
which makes it possible to record and read information linked to domain names. 
Namecoin promises to increase the decentralization of DNS management, and to improve 
security, censorship and privacy. 
Unfortunately, Namecoin is not currently operational due to many reasons such as domain 
squatting. It is worth noting that the Namecoin community has put forward a very simple 
solution to a major problem, that is, the significant increase in the cost of domain name 
renewal. This solution has not yet been implemented due to insufficient take-up.

• Blockstack is the first implementation of a decentralized DNS system on top of the Bitcoin 
network. This implementation combines DNS functionality with a key public infrastructure 
and is primarily intended for use by new applications. 
Blockstack has been operational since September 2015 and currently manages over 70,000 
domain names.

• Ethereum Name Service (ENS). Rather than sending ETH to a public key that is difficult 
to memorize, ENS sends to a jon.sno.eth. type address. The ENS initiative is without 
doubt one of the most promising. Its May 2017 launch was a success with 150,000 names 
attributed at auction using a deposit system that had already collected over 3 million ETH.  
https://ens.codetract.io/

ENS opens up a promising method for future developments that may give them the exact 
same features as domain names. Further, they may already be used in this way within 
navigators such as Mist, the Chrome Metamask plug-in or the online wallet MyEtherWallet.
Although ENS does not yet include a maintenance cost for each name held, this development 
is in the pipeline. It will lead to questions similar to those that have historically impacted the 
world of domain names, that is, concepts of life cycle, grade period and, lastly, drop catching. 
The second market has already begun with https://www.enslisting.com/, for example.



17

Decentralizing auctions in real time

The limitations of current auctions 
All the online auction platforms that currently exist are based on one centralized operation. 
They rely on proprietary and closed software. As a result of this centralization, these platforms 
share the same limitations: 

• They are not open 

• They are not transparent  
Bidders have no way to ensure the origin, authenticity 
and legitimacy of a higher bid. Only the organizer has this 
information. 

Because no one standard exists, each organizer has developed 
its own bidder interfaces and tools. But this proliferation has 
brought down the quality. For example, most auction organizers 
don’t have mobile applications – or their mobile apps aren’t 
ergonomic. Similarly, it is almost impossible to find associated 
auction services even though there is a high level of interest from 
buyers for services ranging from purchase finance to delivery.

Multiple worldwide auction platforms with a range of standards mean that bidders face 
additional limitations involving payment methods or the cost of making international 
payments (exchange rate charges and commissions).

In the world of LIVE auctions, physically run by an auctioneer, most are not yet connected 
through an online platform. Even when this is the case, once again, the ecosystem is of 
extremely poor quality: limited ergonomics, poor quality audio and video streaming, a 
lack of delivery options…
Currently, auctioneers must go through only one provider that sets its own tools and 
platform. No open solution exists that would allow auctioneers to directly and easily 
expand the audience for their sales worldwide. 

Every bidder must use the organizer’s platform for registration, 
authentication and bidding. So, as there are a huge number of auction 
organizers worldwide, a bidder must register many times over. They must 
therefore manage many different accounts and learn how to use a new 
and different interface each time. 

• The ecosystem is very limited



18 Designing an auction blockchain 

We will launch a new, open, decentralized platform that is dedicated to real time 
management of any auction, worldwide, whether online or live.

We want to establish the fundamentals of an ecosystem that is accessible to all, with unlimited 
functionalities and potential. In effect, everyone will be able to connect in order to sell, bid, 
organize an auction or offer a service to the ecosystem. 

The functionalities available on our platform will therefore expand progressively and quickly, 
as they are more widely adopted by the community and by auction professionals. 

• Interoperable: The client will be able to 
participate in auctions run by numerous 
worldwide auction organizers – using just 
one interface. In this way, each bidder 
will be able to select from numerous 
applications or interfaces in order to 
follow or participate in any auction in 
the world without changing their habits.  
This interoperability will also make it 
possible to link to other distributed 
repositories such as those processing 
identity or background data.

• Scalable, reliable and transparent:  
Thanks to the distributed repository 
protocol, each operation will be 
registered within the network in a way 
that is transparent, publicly verifiable 
and virtually impossible to falsify. 

Thus, our solution is:



19

• Fast: In order to remain compatible within the 
“real time” constraint of live auctions (that is, those 
physically run by an auctioneer), the blockchain will 
offer the technical consensus mechanism detailed 
below, ensuring that each higher bid is validated in 
less than 1 second. 

• Very low transaction cost: The technical consensus 
mechanism selected will make it possible to 
secure highly reduced transaction costs based on 
new tokens. This will make it very easy to join the 
blockchain

> > > >  In itself, the decentralized platform will be a low level layer. It will only provide the 
technical fundamentals required (detailed below) to register transactions when bidders and 
higher bidders create sales. 

But thanks to its open standard, it will be possible to superimpose numerous additional 
layers and modules to extend the functionalities and possibilities: 

• Time limits
• Anti snipping
• Increments
• Payment guarantees
• KYC
• Legal limitations
• Escrow
• Instant purchase
• Reserve price
• Auctioneer payments
• Presentation of lots
• Real time audio and video streaming… 



20 Quick up-take by professionals

Designed by a player active in the auction world, the DomRaider solution offers an 
immediate response to industry needs. 

Professional auction organizers will be keen to connect their system to the network as it 
will offer visibility to their auctions and will bring them new buyers. 
As the number of buyers increases, the prices will increase, offering them an immediate 
benefit.

Further the DomRaider solution will not require them to abruptly break away from the system 
they already use. They will be able to adopt it gradually, fully independently, by separating 
out the functional stages.  For example: 

The key point is that professionals will be able to adopt the DomRaider 
solution without having to suddenly switch from their existing system.

1. Straightforward publication of auctions on DomRaider by the organizer without 
clients being able to participate,

2. Publication and participation authorized for clients already registered with the 
organizer,

3. Participation and payment (in paper money or cryptographics),

4. Participation open to all, secured by a payment guarantee,

5. Participation open to all with payment services, trusted third parties, delivery…



21 The emergence of an ecosystem

Thanks to its open and standardized nature, anyone will be able to offer sales relating 
to interfaces or services, and to receive remuneration for these. 

For example, a mobile developer could design and offer an application that acts 
as a universal interface for all blockchain auctions. It could receive remuneration 
through the automatic deduction of a commission on the sales generated through 
its application. 

In this example, the auction organizer will have set the initial auction parameters, and 
whether or not an intermediary is authorized to deduct a commission. If yes, then they 
will be able to set a minimum tariff. 

There fore allowing each party the freedom to implement their own rules sets a fair market 
value:

• The auction organizer will control the level of the commission that they is willing  
to pay,

• The distributors and publishers of client applications will be able to decide a 
maximum commission tariff for featuring or valuing auctions that are underway.

Additional services

Advanced functions

Core of the network

Providers of advanced 
services enhancing the 
functioning of the network

Addition of advanced 
specified rules to organizers 
in order to adapt to different 
types of sale

Logging of bids and 
registration of transactions
Application of common rules

KYC identity checksAnti-snipping

Tools and interfaces 
editors

Logistics services

Brokers and 
intermediairies

Bidding steps

Payment 
guarantee

Immediate purchase

Proof of property

Lenders and escrow

DomRaider Blockchain

Appraisal / Expertise

Blockchain



22 A specific operation
Currently, most blockchain technologies experience real uptake challenges. However, 
DomRaider benefits from a structure that is already established and financed, as well 
as a proven business model that can facilitate the adoption of blockchain technologies 
by integrating them into a solution that is open to the public and accessible to all.

As the DomRaider interface is able to remain unaltered, there is no need for users to be fully 
aware of the disruptive principles or technical complexities of the world of decentralized 
applications, which sometimes hinder adoption.

We intend to progress through the following stages:  

Launch of our network 
with a number of limited 

and controlled nodes 
(contained latency 

network)

Launch of a program of 
financial incentives to 

encourage other parties to 
set up new nodes on the 

network

Migration of the existing 
DomRaider platform to 

ensure compatibility with the 
decentralized network, and 

switch of client domain name 
auctions onto this platform

We will do the same with 
providers of auction 

management tools for 
physical and online auction 

houses

Development of first 
interfaces for auction 

organization and 
participation

Partnerships and occasional 
equity holding in companies 

that organize their own 
auctions in order to expand 

the offer

Expansion and 
diversification of nodes in 

order to guarantee ever 
more transparency and 

immutability

We will offer financial incentives to 
third parties to contribute to the 

expansion of the ecosystem in order to 
integrate specialist partners (specialist 
knowledge, KYC, financial guarantees, 

lenders, logistics, market places…)

1

5

3

7
2

6

4

8



23

The technological element

In order for the DomRaider network to be widely adopted, it must offer a solution that is 
flexible enough to fulfill the following criteria: 

Technical challenges and limitations

• Rapid approval: To remain compatible 
with “live” auctions, it is necessary to 
have a short approval time regardless 
of the number of users and transactions 
competing on the network. We envisage an 
approval time of less than one second. 

• Scalability – Supporting millions of users 
and transactions: As each auction generates a 
significant number of signatures, the technology 
used must be able to carry the burden of this 
information without however reducing the 
network’s performance or creating transaction 
delays. The ability to put an interface in place 
depends on the availability of a thin client 
and the ability to manipulate data (research, 
navigation) that have reached consensus on 
the network’s various nodes.



24

• Maintaining an extremely low transaction 
cost: Wide network adoption must inevitably 
involve strict control of transaction costs for 
users.

• Staying up to date: Taking into account the 
network’s high financial load, the technology 
used must be able to ensure sufficiently smooth 
maintenance, correction and development. In 
particular, we must be able to remain fully able to 
respond to any security threat. 

• Interoperability:  We must be in a position to accept 
any type of fiat currency ($, ¥, €) or cryptocurrency 
in order to enable escrow deposit guarantees, but 
also to manage identity or any other user profile 
metadata.



25

Many interface categories must be put in place depending on the target user’s level of 
competence:

The token management system also plays a role here and for professional users we must 
enable the option to manage hot and cold wallets, that is wallets that reveal their DRT 
reserve (DomRaider Token, detailed below) online (hot wallet) and others that enable 
offline storage (cold wallet). Being offline, ‘cold storage’ solutions are more secure and 
therefore more difficult to hack.

• API for automatic auction software 

• Javascript or turnkey mobile modules for our partners

• Lightwallet for general public users accessing the service from their smartphones or 
phones 

• Heavywallet (full client) for advanced users and those using the service from a laptop or 
desktop. This offers more auction options as well as a research and navigation interface 
in public auctions. 

Accessibility – Focus on the issue of interfaces

The user’s cryptographic identity is also their network authentication and allows them to 
carry out transactions (creation or offer of bids).
There are two potential auction registration methods: 

• Private auction: The auction organizer shares an auction username with a list of users. 
Only those invited (on a whitelist) may place a bid 

• Private auction: Anyone may join and take part.

User authentication 



26

Before planning to develop our own technology, we will benchmark (carry out a comparative 
study) of all the technological variables that might form the basis of our auction solution, 
either for setting up our solution on platforms, of for implementing a fork to adapt it 
specifically to auctions. 

The alternatives that have been examined can be categorized into two categories: 

Benchmark evaluation criteria:

Below there is a non-exhaustive list of the solutions that have been examined with a view 
to using or adapting these to our blockchain auction system. 

• Full on-chain solutions: auctions are entirely managed under the network infrastructure 

• Mixed hybrid on-chain and off-chain solutions: auctions are partially managed 
outside the network infrastructure using security provided by the deposit of on-chain 
guarantees and by transactions signed and published outside the network. 

Development of our platform

Speed and scalability

Importance V1

***

***

***
*****

*****

****
Flexibility to introduce auction  
management and rich functionality

Transaction cost

Ability to manage privacy (avoiding data mining that  
would make it possible to spy on individuals)

Available interfaces  (wallet, lightwallet, API)

Ability to put a reputable system in place

Criteria



27

• MultiChain :
 
MultiChain (a solution published by Coin Sciences Ltd) is a (fork) technology that emerged 
from Bitcoin and is dedicated to the business world, which is why functionalities such 
as rights management (permissioned) have been added, an installation process and the 
addition of automated nodes, the ability to manage multiple assets, and the functionality 
known as “Data Streams.

The Data Streams functionality involves adding a key value database to a blockchain 
infrastructure, which can also be used for managing time series. This function could prove 
a good basis for the (on-chain) management of auction data with accurate time stamping. 
“Production ready” MultiChain 1.0 was announced very recently, that is, on 2 August 2017, 
which makes it even more appealing, especially as scalability has been quoted as 1,000 
transactions per second (to be benchmarked within our context). 

On-Chain Solutions

• Bitcoin sidechain: 

The sidechain concept was invented and patented by the well-known company 
Blockstream, which employs some contributors to the Bitcoin Core.
A “sidechain” is a blockchain (Bitcoin) extension that serves to put in place functionality 
that isn’t available within the “parent chain”: privacy, confidential transactions (hidden 
values), scalability, new signature standards, Zero Knowledge Proof, etc.…
Blockstream recently (22 May 2017) announced that its product “Liquid” was in a beta 
program with around a dozen large client companies.

Among the advantages of sidechains for auction management, we already foresee:

• The ability to segment sidechains: geographic information, auction professional 
categories, etc.…

• Scalability, both in terms of the number of users and the number of transactions

• Data reliability and security when we peg our sidechains to the Bitcoin network. 



28

• Ethereum (permissionned):

At this stage, use of the public Ethereum network isn’t suitable for managing on-chain 
auctions.

However, a permissioned Ethereum infrastructure (but with a public playback network) 
with Parity and an ad hoc consensus algorithm such as Proof of Authority might make 
it possible to achieve significant capacity. Moreover, this configuration is currently being 
tested at the Energy Web Foundation (http://energyweb.org/), which has announced that 
capacity could in time reach 1 million transactions per second.

Another advantage of the Parity solution is the highly promising Polkadot infrastructure 
(https://polkadot.network/) that would enable numerous blockchain infrastructures to 
communicate (credit exchange, execution of smart contracts).

Within the Ethereum ecosystem, auctions could be put in place using a Smart Contract, 
which would be in charge of verifying norms while the infrastructure would time stamp the 
bids placed by participants.

• BigchainDB:

BigChainDB is a technology that uses the benefits of classic NoSQL solutions to achieve 
scalability and resilience by incorporating the idea of transactions and by adapting the 
consensus algorithm (a model known as the Federation Consensus Model)

BigChainDB technology can be deployed on a private or public network (IPDB network).

This technology’s clear benefits could make it extremely appealing within the auctions 
context: load capacity (1m writes per second), rich permissions model (flexibility for open 
auctions or auctions restricted to a whitelist), dynamic changefeed, linear capacity.



29

• HyperLedger Fabric:

The Hyperledger Fabric product was initiated by IBM, which soon entrusted it to the Linux 
Foundation. The Hyperledger ecosystem (which is bigger than Fabric) has experienced 
extremely high growth and the consortium already has 150 members from all industry 
sectors, including Cisco, Airbus, American Express, SAP among others.

Hyperledger Fabric (in 1.0 since June 2017) was designed to respond to business needs 
and offers privacy, scalability, a fully searchable datastore to easily access the content of 
transactions organized in blocks, and numerous consensus algorithms that can be adapted 
according to context.

• ByteBall:

Although it doesn’t operate using the block concept, the Byteball platform forms part of 
the blockchain ecosystem because it offers the same promise of decentralization and 
transaction management without a central controlling body. For the sake of simplicity, one 
could argue that it does in fact use the block concept but with only one transaction. It is 
interesting to note that a fundamental reason for implementing block is the ability to pay 
miners, which isn’t a requirement of the Byteball ecosystem. 

The absence of a block above all means the absence of block time. Thus, a transaction (a 
bid in our case) is written onto the network without a confirmation time lag, other than 
network latency. False or invalid transactions remain present but are disregarded. 

Byteball transaction data are organized in DAG (Directed Acyclic Graph), which creates a 
data structure that is hard to falsify in so far as each new transaction validates preceding 
transactions. 
The chatbot technology incorporated into Byteball is also of interest as it can act as the 
basis for an auction interface. 

Equally, Byteball displays two types of asset: bytes for classic transactions, and Blackbytes 
for private transactions where the raw transaction content (legible format) is sent directly 
to the receiver rather than being published. In order to ensure that there is no double-
spend within Blackbytes, the transaction hash and spend-proof are stored. It is therefore 
possible to manage closed or private auctions even when the network is open. 

 



30

Finally, Byteball makes it possible to issue assets that cannot be moved without the co-
signature of the issuing body (e.g. bank, auction organizer who wishes to manage and 
validate the identity of a bidder). This option is of interest when managing bids in line with 
KYC / AML requirements where they apply.

• IOTA:

The features of the IOTA platform (relevant to auction management) are similar to those set 
out in the Byteball section so do not need to be set out again.

• NEM:

The NEM platform provides services such as payment, messaging, asset issue, and also 
domain name management. 

One of NEM’s unique features is the consensus algorithm known as Proof of Importance 
(POI). The algorithm adjusts the importance (of a node or identity) depending on the 
number of transactions, the identity used to carry out transactions, and other factors. 
Importance strongly influences the probability of a node being selected for calculation of 
a block and collection of charges linked to that block. This system is connected to the 
reputation management Eigentrust++, which makes it possible to filter false identities 
within the network. This mechanism is extremely encouraging within the auction context 
where it is sometimes necessary to avoid dealing with individuals whose behavior is 
inappropriate.

NEM (or an in-house network based on the same principles) may also be of interest for when 
it comes to putting in place an auction system because of the POI benefits, particularly 
the low barriers to entry (energy, cost) necessary for setting up a node. The concept of 
importance is also of interest.  



31

• WAVES:

The WAVES platform includes a decentralized exchange and trading platform, a wallet 
with a simplified customer experience, but also a gateway that complies with fiat currency 
regulations (including the euro). This highly unique positioning makes it a potential 
competitor to leading platforms such as Ethereum.
From a technical point of view, the implementation of a limited number of miner nodes 
and the consensus algorithm known as Leased Proof of Stake (LPoS), a derivative of the 
Delegated Proof of Stake, adds above average scalability and speed.

Within the context of auctions, it is worth undertaking an analysis of the type of the actors 
that will operate the nodes.

• Open Bazaar:

Open Bazaar is a fully decentralized free e-commerce marketplace. The project is founded 
on multiple technologies: the Kademlia hash table system (based on the BitTorrent 
protocol), IPFS (InterPlanetary File System), Ricardian Contracts and the Bitcoin network.

The OpenBazaar platform (currently only accessible on desktop) is extremely inspiring 
from the client experience viewpoint as it allows the final user to search and navigate a 
service catalogue (which could also include bids).  It also offers live chat, which allows 
e-traders and users to communicate. Our ability to create this type of experience is key to 
the success of our project.  

• Other:

We remain open to and on the lookout for any exciting new developments within the 
ecosystem to find any new system that applies and is useful to a decentralized auction 
system. In particular, we will follow the development of new Tezos, EOS and other new 
platforms that will soon be launched.



32

Summary of on-chain solutions

Scalability

Multi Chain ***

***

***

***

***

***

***

***

***

*** ***

***

*** ***

***** *****

***** *****

*****

*****

*****

*****

*****

***** *****

***** *****

*****

*****

*****

*****

*****

*

*

*

**

**

** **

**

**

**

**

****

**** ********

****

****

****

Sidechain Bitcoin

Ethereum (Parity + PoA)

BigchainDB

Hyperledger Fabric

Byteball

IOTA

NEM

Waves

Open Bazaar

Flexibility Interfaces PrivacyFees



33

• Principles of micropayment channels:
 
The principle of micro-payment channels is similar to the tab system currently used by, for 
example, hotels. The process has 3 stages:

The process is similar in the blockchain universe:

>  A security deposit opens the tab. This is the payment network’s 1st request: the 
channel open transaction,

>   The tab increases each time a service is consumed – the network does not request 
payment: channel use,

>   The tab is closed when the trader settles the balance due – this is the second and 
final payment request made by the network: closure of channel.

>  The channel is opened through the (on-chain) publication of a multi-signature 
security with an (on-chain) lock

>   There is an (off-chain) exchange between the client and the trader through shared 
intermediate transactions (tab’s intermediate amounts) or signed cryptographic 
information that is not published on the network

>  The channel is closed when (one of the parties) publishes the final intermediate 
transaction (or closing information), which enables the amount due from the client to 
be settled. 

The advantage of this method is that thousands of transactions can be made with only 
two requests for payment from the network, which minimizes transaction costs while 
also guaranteeing settlement. 

Off-Chain Solutions



34

• Application to the auction mechanism:
 
This process is described from the perspective of micropayment for an ERC20 token 
available through the Ethereum network. This depiction can be adapted to any other 
platform. The process unfolds in 3 stages:

>   Stage 1: Opening of micropayment channel. Each auction participant places a “deposit” 
through a Smart Contract, which represents a bid.

>     Stage 2: Off-Chain exchanges. Exchange of a signed character chain that combines the 
bid amount and its identity.

>   Stage 3: Channel closing. Reimbursement of all auction participants other than the 
auction winner.

From the technical point of view, the deposit is a combination of “transferForm” 
functions (to the “smart contract address) and “approves” the ERC20 token standard. 

It is worth noting that the payment taken to initiate the bid may not represent the total 
amount, which would allow professional users to participate in numerous auctions (on 
the basis that they won’t win all of them). We can envisage payment of a small sum, for 
example 10% of the target amount, on the basis that a delay in payment by the winning 
bidder is possible. In the event that the amount is not settled, the user may lose their 
security deposit and get a bad reputation within the system, which may exclude them from 
certain types of auction. 

TRAFFIC ON
YOUR WEBSITE

Deposit (10%)*

*10% of the bidder’s maximum participation 

Deposit returned to client 

Participation in the auction

Payment of the auction that has been won

Auction
Smart Contract

0

3

2

1

TRADER

CLIENT 



35

Other issues

• Clock synchronization:
 
The operation of auctions requires that particular attention be paid to registration of the 
date that information is received from bidders. Thus, particular attention is paid to the 
issue of clock synchronization within network nodes. 
We intend to use NTP (Network Time Protocol) type protocols and must examine their 
efficiency when nodes are not located within the same network. 

• Privacy:

The transparency of a decentralized approach may allow all users (both well intentioned 
and ill-intentioned) to reconstruct a person’s activity through data analysis (data mining). 
This possibility makes it difficult to protect a person’s privacy on our decentralized auction 
system.

Various (combined) approaches will be implemented to protect user data:

>   Use of Hierarchical Deterministic wallets (inspired by BIP32 Bitcoin) in order to access 
new sub-identities for each new transaction

>  ZKP (Zero Knowledge Proof) protocols

• Token migration:
 
The first version of the DRT token is managed on the Ethereum platform via the ERC20 
token standard.

Once the target platform is in place, we envisage the eventual migration of the token onto 
this new platform. 
Should this become necessary, a token migration mechanism will be put in place to offer 
all DRT token holders the option to migrate their tokens onto the platform that has been 
put in place. The exact methods and time available for carrying out this migration will be 
shared in due course.



36

Roadmap

First version

Using the DRT token:

The DRT token is used to open credit within 
our auction platform. 
This approach makes platform use easy and fluid 

while ensuring that participants are serious, as 

any user who fails to finalize their payment within 

the given time frame (in the event of winning a 

bid) will lose their security deposit and will receive 

a reputation score that may exclude them from 

certain sales. 

We suggest the principle that a security deposit 

(SD) will by default cover a credit search to a value 

equivalent to 10 times the deposit amount. This 

default amount may be adjusted on a case-by-case 

basis by each auction organizer. 

The first version of our platform is developed on the basis of security guarantees that 
use ERC20 DRT tokens and on an auction management system founded on BigChainDB 
technology.

In fact, we have deemed this a realistic approach for the establishment of our platform 
within the given timeframe, that is, December 2017, with a view to integration into our 
DomRaider service in 2018.

In order to control transaction costs, we initially favor using BigchainDB on our own servers 
rather than using the public IPDB infrastructure. Partnerships will be created to diversify 
the parties operating our network nodes. 

From a technical point of view, the deposit is made when a specific function is requested from our 

DRT token. This function has the following parameters: amount to be frozen, length of freezing 

period, address of the bot that can unfreeze the funds or seize them as a transaction penalty (the 

penalty can be set by each auction organizer). 

Description:



37

Using BigchainDB:

Each transaction is a BigchainDB asset whose configuration settings represent information relating 

to the bid.  

Each bid, higher bid and winning bid is a BigchainDB transaction relating to the asset. 

BigchainDB load capacities may (following configuration) allow for handling of a large number of 

bids and in close to real time.

AUCTION PROCESS

DEPOSIT

Shapeshift

Smart Contract
DRT

On demand 
Anonymous wallet

For User

Limited to amount 
of token x loyalty

Default is x10

Bitcoin
Ethereum

Waves
Litecoin

Bitcash...

DRT
( ERC20 )

Ethereum

API

RAISE



38

PRIOR TO AUCTION

• The auction organizer creates a BigchainDB asset that opens the sale
• The user(s) place a DRT deposit to open a credit search whose sum is linked to the 

number of tokens deposited. This deposit can be made in two ways:
>    The DRT token gel (cf paragraph above)
>      A Bitcoin payment, Ethereum to a DomRaider bot that generates a deposit address 
and carries out the DRT token gel for the user account. It is worth notice that by using 

the Shapeshift service this operation will be possible using other cryptocurrencies.

• The bot registers the deposit and records the information within the BigchainDB data

DURING AUCTION

• Users place bids and higher bids via a BigchainDB transaction on the “targeted” asset. The 

auction rules are verified in accordance with the asset’s configuration data.

• The validity of a higher bid is still linked to the deposit being sufficient (information is updated 

by bots)

END OF AUCTION

• The winner is declared and they must make payment in order to end the operation. If the 

payment is made other than with DRT, the auction organizer must note this on the system 

(cryptocurrency payments may be registered automatically by Domraider bots)

• Other users have the option to either withdraw their DRT tokens or leave them as a guarantee 

for other auctions. 

• The bots release the tokens and renew each participant’s “credit search”. Withdrawal of a user’s 

DRT deposit guarantee is only authorized when no auction is in progress.



39

Administering nodes:

Initially, the system is launched using a small number of BigchainDB nodes, all administered by 

DomRaider. Nevertheless, to increase the extent of our service’s decentralization, we will launch 

a program aimed at diversifying the number of parties operating the network. Various different 

incentives encourage an operator to set up a new node:

In parallel to developing version 1 of our platform, an R&D team is working on a number of distinct 

Proofs of Concept (POCs) to follow the evolution of different technologies.

At this stage, we envisage that the following POCs are the most relevant:

However, depending on the way things evolve, the solutions assessed may be different to those 

envisaged and set out in this document. 

In the event that a technological solution demonstrates greater relevance than that in development 

or in production, we will work on (and communicate) a plan to migrate from our platform, under 

the proviso that this does not change user interfaces.

>   Optimization and control of network latency for an auction network user
>   Partnership with auction sector operators.
>  Monthly sponsorship program (participation costs carried by servers) of the TOP 
100 DRT nodes according to the quality of service and length of availability. This 

program will be launched over only 12 months and when it ends DomRaider will 

decide whether or not it is worth replicating.

>   Byteball for testing time stamping without the constraints of block time,
>   Sidechain in order to test chain segmentation,
>  Micropayment channel with ERC20 tokens to assess scalability and check our 
control over transaction costs using this principle.

Proof of Concept to determine the best long-term 
solution



40 Key roadmap dates

July 2013:

October 2016:

June 2017:

October 2017:

December 2017:

April 2018:

September 2018:

May 2017:

September 2017:

November 2017:

February 2018:

June 2018:

creation of

$2m capital raised

DomRaider blockchain 
network designed

DRT tokens issued 
through the ICO

Bids, higher bids and attribu-
tion process managed on our  
private infrastructure 

Launch of the DomRaider 
partnership program with  
auction professionals 

First nodes operated by 
partners not affiliated to 
DomRaider

$2m of additional  
funding secured

Launch of sales + Registration  
of cryptocurrency  
security deposits 

Implementation of an 
ERC20 deposit guarantee 

smart-contract

DomRaider  
auctions switched to 

the blockchain network

First implementation  
with a third party partner



41 Typical auction process

Organizer A opens a 
new sale and sets its 

main parameters 

>  Rules

>  Dates / duration

>  Required deposit (%)   (*)

>  Payment deadline once bid has been won 
(*)

>  Anti snipping

>  Increments

>  Base currency

>  Payment guarantee

>  Details of the item being sold (description, 
features, photos, videos…)

>  Organizer information

>  Seller information

> Guarantee delegation (the organizer may 
decide to free their own clients from the 
need to make a payment guarantee via the 
blockchain by doing so through their own 
site) 

>  KYC and associated limitations (for 
example, excluding buyers who are 
geographically ineligible to take part in a 
sale)

>  Instant purchase

>  Reserve price

>  Organizer charges

>  Intermediary commissions

>  Rules for validating bidders (which may 
or may not require the organizer’s prior 
approval)

>  Live streams (audio/video streaming for 
live sales)

Bidder B issues 
a participation 

request

A validates B’s access 
to participate in the 

sale

A confirms the bid of 
100

A validates C’s access 
to participate in the 

sale

A refuses the bid as it 
does not comply with 
the sale’s minimum 

increment

A confirms the bid  
of 150

A refuses the bid as 
another live bidder 

in the hall offered the 
same amount  

before B

B asks to place a bid 
of 250

A proceeds to call the 
sale for B at 250

B places a bid of 100

Bidder C issues 
a participation 

request 

C places a bid of 101

C asks to place a bid 
of 150

B asks to place a bid 
of 200

A registers a “live”  
bid of 200

A confirms the bid  
of 250

A B C
Bidder Bidder Bidder

(*) The auction organizer sets the deposit guarantee 
percentage needed to validate a bid. For example, 10% 
and a payment deadline of 5 days: If the other validity 
conditions have been met, a 500 euro bid is only valid if 
the amount held corresponds to 50 euros. In the event 
that the auction participant wins the sale, they will have 
5 days to pay for the bid and any failure to do so will re-
sult in them losing their security deposit (the 50 euros).



42

Using the DomRaider Token

Information
DRTs may only be used to participate and access auctions set up using DomRaider technology. 

Once this auction network has been created, DRTs may be used on the network as outlined below.  

However, DomRaider tokens cannot be used prior to DomRaider having developed the blockchain 

technology for auction sales. They may, however, be freely exchanged once they have become 

available. 

To sum up, the bidding system set up by DomRaider will make it possible to: 

• Acquire DRTs

• Use DRTs

PROVIDERS OF ADDITIONAL SERVICES

Spotters

SellersOrganizersBuyersBidders /



43

• By selling associated network services: Any service provider wishing to provide a 
complementary auction service may take part in the planned transactions and receive 
payment from clients in DRTs. For example, a financial services provider who guarantees 
a security deposit against volatility during an auction may bill for its services in DRTs. 

Acquiring tokens

• By receiving sales commissions: 

• By selling goods or products at auction 
Rather than settling with fiat currency, the auction organizer may choose to directly provide 
the seller with the profits of the sale in DRTs. A skilled seller may also act both as seller and 
organizer. In this way they will have complete control over their auction.

>  As an auction organizer:
An organizer is free to set the level of the commission they wishe 
to deduct from the winning bid of any auctions they launch.  This 
commission, paid in DRTs, will be added or deducted from the 
final sales price, in line with the initial settings.

>  As an intermediary:
When an organizer has allowed for this in their initial configuration, 
business providers, platforms or even mobile application 
providers may receive a commission in DRTs on sales where the 
winning bidder has gone through this intermediary.



44 Spend tokens

• By organizing auctions: Publishing a new auction on the network does 
not involve a direct transaction cost for the organizer, however they must 
first provide a deposit guarantee in DRTs. This will be fully reimbursed at 
the end of the completed sale as all sale transaction costs are added to 
the sales price.  The security deposit may at any time be partially retained 
to cover transaction costs in the event that the sale does not complete, or 
if the organizer cancels it, or if the winner is exempt from direct payment 
(organizer client or sales parameters).

• As a security deposit for certified auctions: For auctions where the 
organizer requires a security deposit, bidders must systematically “cover” 
their bids with an associated security deposit in DRTs. This deposit will be 
held in escrow only during the time that the auction is valid and will be 
released as soon as the client loses their hand. It works in a similar way to a 
debit pre-authorization on a bankcard.

• By winning bids: For auctions where the organizer requires a security 
deposit, winning a bid leads to the transfer of the corresponding sum placed 
by the bidder in their security deposit. The sum is then distributed between 
the buyer, organizer and intermediary. It is possible to envisage that the 
security deposit might be a little higher in order to cover exchange rate risk 
between an auction’s fiat currency and the DRT, which might arise during the 
sale period. Where applicable, the buyer will be reimbursed the remaining 
differential at the end of the sale. 



45 Volume of transactions

Launch of the DomRaider network will very quickly involve all transactions from 
auctions directly organized by DomRaider.

With their already high growth, this will ensure that the network is immediately used 
effectively, increasing the probability of large scale and quick uptake. 

In addition, DomRaider will, as soon as possible, put everything in place to finalize first 
integration contracts with major auction organizers.

An increase in the volume of global transactions will depend directly on the correlation of 
3 intrinsically linked factors:

• An increase in the number of organizers publishing new auctions  

• An increase in the number of auctions launched by organizers  

• An increase in the number of potential buyers following and taking part in 
available auctions  

• An increase in the number of intermediaries promoting auctions on offer and 
providing access tools 

• An increase in the number of complementary service providers extending the 
network’s functionality for organizers and buyers.



46

Sale of DomRaider tokens

Tokens will be sold from 16/08/2017 to 11/10/2017, in 2 phases:

The pre-sale: From 16/08/2017 at 0800 UTC/GMT to 11/09/2017 at 0800 UTC/GMT

The sale: From 12/09/2017 at 0800 UTC/GMT to 11/10/2017 at 8h00 UTC/GMT

The tokens issued come with an “action requirement” from DomRaider, that is, to 
develop a public auction blockchain. 

Duration and process

Trade-off

The total number of tokens sold during the pre-sale period cannot exceed 75% of the total 
number of tokens initially put up for sale by the ICO; that is, a maximum of 262,500,000 tokens.
If the number of requests received during the pre-sale period exceeds this level, requests 
will be honored in chronological order in line with the set limit, and the excess orders will be 
returned to clients.



47 Initial token distribution

The Trading Operation foresees the creation and distribution of 1 billion 
DomRaider Tokens (DRT) distributed as follows: 

• 35% of tokens, that is 350,000,000, will be sold during the course of the 
DomRaider ICO trading operation

• 15% of tokens, that is 150,000,000, will be distributed ex-gratia 
to stakeholders that have contributed to the operation’s success 
 

• 50% of tokens, that is 500,000,000, will be held in reserve by DomRaider. 
Their use is detailed below

The tokens sold during the ICO, DRT, will only be issued at this time. In this way, their total 
number will be determined and fixed at the end of the sale, guaranteed by a smart contract 
linking them to the blockchain.

1,000,000,000
Total number of tokens created

Type of token:  ERC20

Sale price :  €0,10 / DRT  

Value of the sale:  
capped at € 35m (excluding any 
potential stretch goal) 

Pre sale from  
16/08/2017 to 11/09/2017

Sale from  
12/09/2017 to 11/10/2017

Guaranteed sale :  
Unsold tokens will be pur-
chased by DomRaider’s two 
principal shareholders, Inovaa 
and Eefficiency

locked for ecosystem 
incentive

sold during ICO

distributed to stakeholders  
(team, advisors, community)

50%

35%

15%

Les DRT seront négociables sur les exchanges. Nous sommes actuellement en discussion

avec :



48

When the sales period ends, tokens will be issued and distributed to clients via a smart-
contract within 7 days, that is, by 18/10/2017.

• Sold tokens may be used and transferred from the time they are assigned. 

• 20% of tokens distributed free of charge to stakeholders that have 
contributed to the operation’s success will be immediately useable and 
transferable. The remaining 80% will be released gradually at 10% of the 
total each month from the date the first tokens are issued. In this way, every 
holder of tokens obtained through this category will have received full free 
usage and transferability of these tokens 8 months following their issue. 
 

• The tokens held in reserve by DomRaider will be locked at a level of 90% of the 
reserve and released gradually at 5% of the total reserve per month. Their use 
is described below. 

Unlocking is carried out automatically in line with the rules set out in the token smart-contract. 

Token availability



49

During the ICO (Initial Coin Offering) sales period, the tokens shall be offered at the 
single price of €0.10/DRT ($0.117/DRT) (DomRaider Token).

As the payment of Orders are offered in multiple currencies, the number of tokens pre-
allocated during an Order shall be calculated on the basis of the exchange rate in force at the 
moment that the Customer’s payment is received.
 
Between the moment that the Order is validated by the Customer and the reception of the 
Customer’s payment, there may be exchange rate variations which could lead to a subsequent 
increase or decrease of the number of tokens pre-allocated to the Customer.
 
The payment of the tokens can be made by credit card, by SEPA (Single Euro Payments Area) 
direct debit, by SWIFT bank transfer or by PayPal.

Acquisition price and conditions

Customers also have the possibility of acquiring tokens against other crypto currencies.
Thus, they can order DRTs against Ethers (the Ethereum network’s currency) or even against 
Bitcoins.
Once again, the number of tokens pre-allocated during an order shall be calculated on the 
basis of the chosen crypto currency exchange rate at the moment when the reception of the 
Customer’s payment is confirmed. When a payment transaction is still valid 15 minutes after 
its execution, it shall be considered as being confirmed (the number of confirmation blocks 
can vary according to the blockchain used and the network’s level of congestion).

The chosen rate shall be that supplied by the Kraken exchange platform   

> https://www.kraken.com
Any transaction fees (gas) shall be in addition and be paid by the 
Customer.

The instantaneous conversion service, Shapeshift, shall also be offered to Customers wishing 
to pay with another crypto currency used by the service. The same calculation method used 
for the payment in Ether shall also be applied to set the number of pre-allocated tokens.

All the indicated and displayed prices shall be drawn up exclusive of tax and exempt from any 
service not specifically listed.



50

The entire amount shall be due and payable at the moment of the order. The ordered tokens 
shall only be allocated and delivered upon receipt of payment.

During the timeframe between the payment of the Order and the delivery of the tokens, the 
funds or crypto currency paid by the Customer shall be kept by DomRaider.

The payment shall be considered to have been made when DomRaider cashes the effective 
price. Any remittance of a title recognizing an obligation to pay does not constitute an 
effective payment (bill of exchanges must be accepted beforehand). Early payment shall not 
lead to a discount. 

       If the instructing party is not the End Customer, then the Customer shall undertake to 
make sure that the End Customer complies with the formalities of French Law No. 75-1.334  
regarding subcontracting, which shall be considered under the terms of the General Sales 
Conditions as being an international public policy enactment, the absence of any presentation 
or approval leading to the Customer’s impossibility to claim an Order against DomRaider (e.g. 
for any claims regarding a non-compliance with regard to the specifications). The Customer 
shall remain, nevertheless, bound to perform its contractual obligations with regard to any 
third parties of the chain. Any telecommunication expenses incurred when accessing the 
Company’s services shall be paid by the Customer.



51

In order to prevent any phishing risks, please make sure that the address which 
appears in your browser is uniquely and exclusively: https://www.domraider.io/ before 
attempting to make a connection or purchase. In particular, check that the connection 
is secured (green padlock) and that the extension of the ‘.io’ domain name is the right 
one.

Ordering process

1. Any Customer wishing to purchase tokens must register beforehand at DomRaider’s ICO 
website:     
>   https://www.domraider.io/. 

2. Customers must then validate the email address they have indicated, and then enter 
their invoicing information.

3. Customers shall then be requested to enter the Ethereum portfolio address in which 
they wish to receive the DomRaider tokens. If they do not yet have a portfolio, they can 
follow the instructions to generate one.

4. They may then enter the number of tokens they wish to purchase and choose the 
payment method of their choice.

5. In the event that a Customer wishes to make a payment in crypto currency, they shall 
receive their own unique recipient address to which the currency they have chosen shall 
be sent.

6. As soon as the deposit of the funds has been validated, Customers shall receive a 
confirmation of their allocation by email.

7. At any moment, Customers can consult the history of their Orders and the tokens which 
they have been consequently allocated at DomRaider’s ICO website.

8. At the end of the ICO sales period, Customers can monitor the status of the final 
allocation of tokens and their delivery.



52

In addition, and when its own reserve of tokens has been used up, DomRaider shall set up 
a continuous buyback program in order to pursue the actions described in the previous 
paragraph.

Token buyback program

If all the issued tokens put up for sale are sold out during the ICO sales period, DomRaider 
reserves the right to increase the total number of DRTs to be issued during the Commercial 
Operation.

Stretch goals

In this case:

OF THE 70%
ADDITIONAL TOKENS 

OF THE 30%
ADDITIONAL TOKENS 

shall be put on sale  
AT THE SAME PRICE USED 
IN THE PREVIOUS SALES 
PHASE

shall be distributed 
FREE OF CHARGE BETWEEN ALL THE 
DRT HOLDERS, IN PROPORTION TO 
THE NUMBER OF TOKENS THEY OWNED 
BEFORE THE INCREASE OF THE TOTAL 
NUMBER OF TOKENS TO BE ISSUED.

If there are several successive modifications during the ICO sales period, the distribution of 
additional free tokens shall be cumulative for each holder. 

The calculation shall be identical whatever the nature of the future holders, including for the 
stakeholders who contributed to the Commercial Operation and DomRaider with regard to 
its token reserve.



53

In this example, the final distribution of the issued tokens shall be modified as follows:
• 46.7 % of the tokens, i.e. 700,000,000, sold during the ICO

• 12.3% of the tokens, i.e. 184,615,000, distributed to the stakeholders who contributed to 
the success of the Operation

• 41% of the tokens, i.e. 615,385,000, to be kept by DomRaider

Example:

Customer A purchases 10,000 
DRTs pour €1,000 at the ICO 

launch on 12/09

DomRaider decides to add 200 
million DRTs to the total to be 

issued, i.e., a total of 1.2 billion 
tokens

30%, i.e. 60 million are 
distributed free of charge to the 

previous holders

The additional 140 million 
tokens put up for sale are all 

sold by 20/09

70%, i.e. 210 million are put up 
for sale at €0.10/token

70%, i.e. 140 million are put up for sale  
at €0.10 each

Customer A receives 600 additional 
free DRTs as he or she already owns 
10,000 / 1,000,000,000 (0.001%) of the 
tokens. They shall therefore receive the 
same proportion of the 60 million DRTs 
distributed free of charge

Customer A receives 800 additional free 
DRTs as he or she already owns  

10,600 / 1,200,000,000 (0.00088%) of the 
tokens. He or she shall therefore receive 

the same proportion of the 90 million 
DRTs distributed free of charge

DomRaider decides to add 300 million 
DRTs to the total to be issued, i.e. a total  
of 1.5 billion tokens

30%, i.e. 90 million are distributed free  
of charge to the previous holders

The 350 million DRTs put up for sale  
(out of a planned total of 1 billion)  
are all sold by 14/09



54

• If, at the end of the sale period, on 11/10/2017, there are still some unsold 
tokens, the two major shareholders of DomRaider, Eefficiency and Inovaa, 
have undertaken to purchase the surplus.

• If, on the other hand, at the end of the sale period, the orders are higher than 
the number of available tokens, these will be allocated to the Customer by 
chronological order of their Orders. Any Orders which are not honored, shall 
be reimbursed to the Customers in question within the week via the original 
payment method (bank transfer, credit card, PayPal or crypto currency).

End of the sale

Use of the funds

• The growth of DomRaider’s business
• The development of the blockchain dedicated to auctions
• The acquisition of stakes in strategic targets in order to develop the use of the 

network and its functionalities

The profits from the sale of the tokens shall enable DomRaider to fund:

The breakdown of the planned use is presented hereinafter, in the ‘financial considerations’ 
section.



55 Use of the tokens in reserve

DomRaider shall use the planned reserve of tokens for the following purposes:

• To promote the project in order to develop the visibility and adoption of the network         
>  Bonuses and Bounty for the community

        >  Purchasing advertising visibility and media

• Additional sales to fund new aspects of the project or new acquisitions in order to 
develop the DomRaider network

• Payment of incentives to broaden usage:
        >  Bug bounty
        >  Funding open source contributors
        >  Partnerships with auction organizers
        >  Partnerships with additional service providers



56

Stakeholders

Our values
Putting people at the heart of everything and our decentralized decision-making approach 
is inspired by the guiding principles of ‘liberated companies’, in other words helping each 
employee to play a full part in the success of the company. We were awarded the 

                           
 label in 2017, as being one of the best start-up companies to work for. Each

 member of the team is autonomous and responsible for their tasks. The fruits of the labour 
are shared thanks to a free-share allocation program rendering each employee a shareholder.



57

In 2013, he founded DomRaider which in less than 2 years become the leading drop catcher 
(The service of reserving expired domain names) in France.   In 2016, the company grew 
exponentially with its headcount increasing from 5 to 28 employees. In 2017, DomRaider has 
been accredited in more than 20 countries and has opened its first 3 international branches. 
 

In June 2016, Tristan was elected onto the AFNIC Board of Administration, the French 
state’s official .fr registry under the authority of the Minister in charge of the Digital Economy. 
He seats alongside representatives of the ministries in charge of electronic communications, 
industry and research.

In 2017, Tristan launched the Turing22 project which includes the extension and renovation 
of close to 5,000 m2 of next generation offices and co-working spaces in the La Pardieu 
Technological Zone in Clermont-Ferrand, integrating large lounge spaces with pool tables 
and table soccer tables, 3 large laid-out terraces, a 100-seat auditorium and a fitness center. 
Bivouac, the Clermont-Auvergne startups accelerator, which has recently been labelled 
Frenchtech, is already installed there.

The team

The founder, Tristan Colombet, is  a
 successful  serial entrepreneur.
He founded his first company, Prizee.com, when he was only 
18 years old. Within a few years, his platform, which specialized 
in organizing award-winning competitions for the general 
public, was the leader of the French casual gaming sector. 

He won 1st Prize in the               Technology Fast 50 in 2006

for Prizee.com’s spectacular growth of 6,577% over 5 years. By the next year, 
the company was employing 150 people with a turnover of €13.7 million. 

In 2012,   with 35 million gamers using the Prizee network, Tristan was approached by 
the international corporation Digital Virgo, who wanted to develop the gaming website 
worldwide. The sale was entered into in June.

This sale enabled Tristan to launch Eefficiency, his own investment fund dedicated to startups. 
He acquired 20% of Linxo in 2013, which has since become one of the stars of Fintech.
Following another investor round of more than €20 million in 2017, he sold his stake to 3 large 
financial institutions (Crédit Mutuel Arkéa, Crédit Agricole, MAIF).  

Tristan COLOMBET - CEO



58

Christophe DAVID
CFO - CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER

Christophe not only graduated from a business school with a 
degree in international management but he also has a degree 
in accounting. During his career he has worked in innovation, 

and consultancy as well as setting up of companies. Thus, in 1998, he set up Zencod, a 
company developing hardware crypto accelerators, which he sold to Thalès in 2004. Always 
motivated by highly ambitious entrepreneurial challenges, his encounter with DomRaider 
was a natural fit. The enthusiasm was shared and immediate. Always a leader, he is now the 
guarantor of investments and fundraising.

Delphine DELAIRE
SALES MANAGER

Results driven, tuned into the needs of customer, and a 
business school graduate, Delphine initially specialized in 
international management and corporate finance. She was a 

project manager for franchise-oriented profit centers. She then joined the DomRaider team 
in order to participate in the drop catching business as the Sales Manager.

A legend says that Vincent was there before the Internet… 
It may well be true. After several entrepreneurial adventures 
under his belt, in particular in the referencing field, he joined 

the ranks of DomRaider at its inception.
He is the man that you can count on in the technical team, there is never a problem with him 
just solutions. He thinks things over, he arbitrates, he prioritizes and everything sorts itself 
out. His natural curiosity has led him to have an in-depth knowledge of all the programming 
languages, as much at the Front End as the Back End, he has good people skills with his teams 
and is always kind and friendly. An excellent trainer, he will improve any team’s expertise.  

Vincent VERMERSCH
CTO - CHIEF TECHNICAL OFFICER



59

Damien HENRIQUES
CMO - CHIEF MARKETING OFFICER

Damien is customer centric, and after earning his stripes 
working in customer service and marketing, Damien set up 
his own marketing agency. His goal was to satisfy the needs 

of large multinational companies such as Michelin, Limagrain and Volvic. Five years later, he 
decided to sell his share in his company for a new more digital-orientated challenge and 
joined DomRaider. Here, he thinks globally, his goal is to be as efficient and effective as 
possible and he carries out his marketing and communication tasks like no one else. 

Begoña GARRIDO
INTERNATIONAL OPERATIONS 
MANAGER

Born in Spain and with a degree in Translating and Interpreting, 
Begoña chose France as she reoriented her focus towards 

International Trade studies. She began her career in a multilingual customer service 
department and quickly moved up the ladder towards purchasing.
As Chief Product Purchaser, she used all the traditional purchasing levers to carry out 
successful negotiations (planning, simplification, pooling together needs) and thus building 
long-term sustainable relations with global partners!
Strongly focused on added value and customer needs, at DomRaider she is implementing its 
international product strategy and coordinating its development.

Yu Fang WANG

Yufang is passionate about new technologies. 
After obtaining a Bachelor’s Degree from the Henan University, 
she worked for four years at the Vocational Education Institution 

of Chengdu and the Huangshui College of Chengdu as an IT professor. She taught herself to 
speak French. In 2016, she came to France to pursue her IT studies. Armed with her specific 
knowledge and skill set, she has joined DomRaider’s international team.

CHINESE MARKET MANAGER



60

Kosuke KAWASAKI

Multilingual, Japanese, French, English; Kosuke is DomRaider 
‘s samurai carrying out any services in Japanese! Born in 
Japan, he arrived in France when he was 20 years old. After 

getting a Bachelor’s Degree in sociology, he worked in the international trade, construction 
and translation sectors. Since 2012, he has worked in journalism and reported from the field 
during the Ukrainian conflict, and the Charlie Hebdo terrorist attack.  In 2016, bolstered by 
this experience, he became a student again and obtained a Master’s Degree in social politics 
and territorial development, and became interested in new systems such as crypto currency 
and blockchains… topics which interested him so much that he joined our team!

JAPAN MARKET MANAGER

Svetlana KOVIN

Svetlana is results-oriented, has strong negotiating skills and 
expertise in process optimization. After working for 8 years in 
Moscow, she followed her husband when he came to France 

to work for a French multinational company. After graduating with two Master’s Degrees in 
France (in Marketing and Technical Communication), she was in charge of developing and 
implementing B2B and B2C Customer Services for different multinational companies. She 
joined DomRaider to develop the Russian market.

RUSSIAN MARKET MANAGER

A Chinese proverb says: “Read as many books as you can 
and travel as far as the path allows you”. Born in the Yunnan 
mountains region, she always wanted, from her childhood 

memories, to leave one day and explore the world. Her passion for languages and literature 
led her to France where she continued her studies after having obtained a degree in literature 
in China. For 4 years, in Jinan, she worked in different fields as an editor and sales assistant. 
She has been working in France since 2012. Curious and always in search of new challenges, 
she joined DomRaider’s international team for the “DomRaider ICO” project!

CHINESE MARKET MANAGER
Dan YU



61

Simonetta CHINES

A keen linguist, Simonetta began as a teacher in Italy. After 
obtaining a Master’s Degree in Modern Letters at the University 
of Turin, she emigrated to France to pursue her career. After 

obtaining another Master’s Degree from the University of Caen (Normandy), she taught Italian, 
and on the side, began to publish novels for an Italian publishing house. She has won several 
awards during creative writing competitions. Two of her stories will be in the final of a national 
competition organized by the press company Mondadori. The ICO is a new challenge for her!

ITALIAN MARKET MANAGER

Ana MONTERO

Ana speaks four languages, is autonomous, a perfectionist and 
pugnacious.
She went to the United States when she was 15 years old, then 

travelled to Australia, England and France. She then worked for a well-known law firm and 
other Spanish, French, Italian companies as an interpreter. She graduated from the University 
of Granada with a Master’s Degree in Translating and Interpreting. Ana joined the DomRaider 
international team and will be happy to support Customers in Spanish-speaking countries 
during the ‘DomRaider ICO’ project.

SPANISH MARKES MANAGER

Alice KENNEDY

Meticulous, and operational, Alice began her career as an 
English teacher in Paris. She then returned to the United 
Kingdom to get a Master’s Degree before working for a project 

at a law firm for two years. She has returned to France to develop the company’s business in 
English-speaking markets.

ENGLISH MARKET MANAGER



62

Favorite tech stack: • Anything with reactive programming and strong typing

His + •  I design architecture with strong data consistency 

Etienne ROUDEIX

Etienne has a professional Bachelor’s Degree in Networks 
and Communication. He is extremely curious, with an interest 

in a broad range of topics and he is always gathering information to learn more. He gives 
the tempo to the Back End team, he hates approximations. He is ambitious and strives for 
perfection and only stops when he has achieved it. But with his sense of humor, kidding 
around with his colleagues remains his best talent!

LEAD DEV BACK END

Favorite tech stack: • ReactiveX
• PHP7
• RethinkDB

• Kubernetes
• Docker
• ReactJS

His +
• MongoDB 
• AngularJS 
• Material Design 

• Docker 
• Elastic Search

Kévin BARGOIN

While he was still in his senior year internship at Prizee.com, 
Tristan COLOMBET offered Kévin the position of developer at 
Eefficiency. Freshly graduated with a degree in Web Develop-

ment, it was therefore alongside Tristan that he learnt how to work. From test to test, from 
new ideas to projects, the code lines came out fast and furious. In August 2013, he partici-
pated in the creation of 4X (ex-DomRaider). Organized and autonomous, Kévin has been an 
historical and vital link of the team and has perfect knowledge of DomRaider.

LEAD DEV FULL STACK



63

Favorite tech stack:

Favorite tech stack: • Laravel
• PostgreSQL

• AngularJS
• Swift

• React, 
• React Native

His + • Mobile development

• React
• React Native

• PHP
• Node

His + • React 
• MachineLearning

When he was employed by an international industrial company he 

was also working as a freelancer developing mobile applications. 

He joined DomRaider but above all the team! A keen sportsman, team spirit is part of his DNA and 

DomRaider’s values perfectly match his own. He listens, knows how to adapt to constraints and is 

patient. He gives true balance to the Front end team.

Florian PEREIRA

From missions in different companies to more personal projects, 

Florian can never get enough when it comes to coding or discovering 

a new language! He works quickly, very quickly. The more complicated something is, the more he 

excels. He always has the mot juste with his excellent repartee. He loves algorithms almost as much 

as he hates meetings.

REACT LEAD DEV 

Logan LESAGE
LEAD DEV FRONT / IOS Lead Dev



64

Favorite tech stack:

Favorite tech stack: • Scala 
• Play Framework

• Akka 
• Cycle.js

His + • Advanced system knowledge

• Nginx  
• React
• Symfony

His + • Project management & Open Source

A graduate of EPITECH [Paris Graduate School of Innovation], 
Matthieu is both a developer and an entrepreneur.
His technical expertise is thus enhanced by his strategic vision 

and his customer centricity.
He is passionate about scalability issues and notably worked as an architect for Prizee.com. 
After 5 years as an entrepreneur, he joined DomRaider in 2016 to work on the optimization of 
the drop catching algorithms.
His philosophy: sharing and progressing.

Jérémy MARODON

Jérémy is interested in many topics, is enthusiastic and is re-
sults-driven. He believes in respecting his commitments, he 
does everything in his power to achieve his individual, team 

and company objectives. After having worked for the region’s largest companies as well as 
start-ups, he was convinced into becoming part of the project by the challenge of designing 
solutions that would be used by thousands of daily users, the large-scale technical challenge 
and the team.

FULL STACK DEVELOPER

Matthieu HUGUET
BACK END LEAD DEV



65

Favorite tech stack:

His + • Object-oriented programming (design pattern)

Favorite tech stack: • Linux
• Nginx

• MongoDB
• PHP

• NodeJs

His + • Network inter-connectivity

• API Rest
• Kubernetes
• Docker

• RabbitMQ
• PHP7

Mike Nopère

For Mike, nothing is impossible. Entirely self-taught, he is our 
“crazy geek coder”. He has expertise in several techniques, has 
a broad knowledge base and is very mischievous. He remains 

calm in every circumstance, is enthusiastic and proactive.

Convinced of the benefits of teamwork, Alban likes to learn 
and share on a daily basis. Replying to complex issues by 

simple programs motivates him to continually search for new approaches.

BACK END DEVELOPER

Alban BAIXAS
BACK END DEVELOPER



66

Romuald CLERMONT
BRAND CONTENT & COMMUNITY MANAGER

Before the position of Community Manager was recognized in 
the corporate world, Romuald was already doing this job as he 
was the one who invented it! He experienced an initial success 

at Babymoov where he contributed to the brand’s development. An expert in social media, 
he is connected everywhere and all the time. He is also a specialist in editorial strategy and 
content creation.

Julien FERNANDES
COMMUNICATIONS AND 
PARTNERSHIPS MANAGER

Julien is the globetrotter of the marketing team. After a year’s 
experience working in communications for a digital company, 

Julien left to work for The Walt Disney Company in the USA. On his return to France, he searched 
for a marketing-based position and one which had an international dimension: DomRaider 
was the perfect fit! Very organized, he develops the dashboards and reports for all the events 
in which DomRaider takes part. Monday in Montreal, Tuesday in Berlin, Wednesday in Rimini, 
Friday in Las Vegas...sometimes, we ask ourselves whether he has the gift of omnispresence.
In September, he is going to open the Canadian subsidiary.

Sabrina GAILLAC
COMMUNICATIONS AND 
PARTNERSHIPS MANAGER

Sabrina observes, notes things and then only acts after she 
has analyzed everything. She can tackle and understand a 

wide range of topics. She recently participated in the launch of an airline company, designed 
and monitored this project’s communication and media strategy. She is now exercising her 
talents in the drop catching sector. Intelligent and smart she has an expert knowledge of the 
codes of communication and uses them perfectly.



67

Paul DECOMBES
DIRECT MARKETING MANAGER

A graduate of ESC (Clermont-Ferrand Business School), Paul 
worked in marketing for M6, Casino and Fnac. He then took 
a ‘back-packing’ break and crossed the American continent 

from Canada to Argentina. Five months later, back in the marketing field where he decided 
to specialize in direct marketing. At DomRaider, Paul is Mister Numbers. CRM (Customer 
Relationship Management) is his favorite playing field. If you need reports, database extracts 
or results, then Paul is your man! He will be super happy to help you, he loves it!

Séverine DEMAY

EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT

Séverine has 10 years of experience in support positions 
in administrative management, customer service, human 
resources and after-sales service. She worked for startups for 

five years before joining DomRaider. At the time, the creator was already a certain Tristan 
Colombet...Her smiley nature and versatility are key assets in her multi-task role at DomRaider.

Lauren GAVALDA
ADMINISTRATIVE MANAGEMENT
ASSISTANT

Like Super Woman but without the red cape, it is simply Lauren 
does everything! She is the super assistant who helps out all the 

departments in their administrative tasks. With a very cross-functional and very operational 
role, she takes into account everyone’s requests, searches for and finds the solution. And 
always with a smile and a cup of coffee!



68

Sébastien DONNÉ
PRODUCT OWNER

With a career path in both business and communication, 
Sébastien has worked in Columbia and in Germany. Influenced 
by Latin humor and exactitude, Sébastien, like the White 

Rabbit in Alice in Wonderland, is never late! For DomRaider he is the Product Owner and 
disseminates Agile methods. With his rigor and his phlegmatic nature, he navigates between 
departments with…agility.

Florent BLIN

Likeable and optimistic, he  loves finding new customers. 
In the past, he worked in sales management in Scandinavia 
(Norway, Sweden). A graduate of the KEDGE Marseille Business 

School (previously Euromed Management), he is today in charge of developing DomRaider’s 
business in the Swedish market.  

COUNTRY BUSINESS DEVELOPER 

Jonathan COTE
ACCOUNT MANAGER

After graduating with a degree in asset management insurance 
and after implementing insurance plans for companies of all 

sizes for several years, Jonathan’s career path was already mapped out. Constantly in search 
of new knowledge, Jonathan wanted to work in a sector he is passionate about. Curious by 
nature, he is capable of registering a lot of information very quickly. Very comfortable with 
new technologies, he has had to familiarize himself with the services and functionalities 
of DomRaider’s drop catching business. His team spirit and people skills means that he 
sees customer service not just as a department but as an attitude which always focuses on 
customer satisfaction. 



69

Armel SADON
ACCOUNT MANAGER

Kathleen DURAND
ACCOUNT MANAGER

After studying applied foreign languages, her entrepreneurial 
spirit incited her to create her own company. She then worked 
for the family business developing and managing customer 

service and vocational training. A few years later, she took on a new challenge and joined 
the DomRaider adventure. With her sparkling personality and a permanent smile on her 
lips, Kathleen is passionate about her work: exchanging with customers, advising them, 
supporting them or explaining to them the website’s latest news. She loves to share the 
customer experience with the technical team in order to develop the best solution for 
customers.

For a long time he made of use of his talents in the tourism 
sector, and this is why he believes in quality of service and 
results. A manager recognized for his human qualities, he 

has worked for a number of companies and obtained excellent results. Armel is demanding 
in ensuring that DomRaider serves its customers as best as possible, and is particularly 
demanding of himself.

A polyglot, he has lived in an international environment 
from his earliest childhood. He moved to France to study at 
university and obtained a Master’s Degree in Management 

and International Trade. He has also worked for two large multinationals. Bolstered by this 
experience, he joined the DomRaider team in 2017 in order to develop its Italian business.

Gianandrea POZZI
COUNTRY BUSINESS DEVELOPER 



70 Advisors

Laurent LELOUP,

In 2006, after a 25-year career in corporate finance, Laurent founded Finyear (media & events 
Finance & Innovation) then Blockchain Daily News (media & events Blockchains & Distributed 
Ledgers) in 2016.

In 2016, he founded Chaineum SAS (ICO advise & blockchain Strategy), Blockness SAS 
(Blockchain Consulting), the BeAchain (Blockchain Oriented Objects) project and France 
Blocktech (blockchain ecosystem organization).

In 2017, he launched the Blockchain Valley (blockchain campus & startup incubator) 
project, co-founded the Voxchain (social choice and universal Proof-of-Stake algorithm for 
blockchains) project with Voxcracyet and wrote «Blockchain, la révolution de la confiance» 
[Blockchain, the trust revolution](Eyrolles, February 2017), a new book «Trustnomics, ou 
comment la confiance va changer le monde» [Trustnomics, or how trust is going to change 
the world] will be published by Eyrolles in February 2018.

He is also a keynote speaker (blockchain technology & ecosystems), participates in various 
blockchain working groups (AFNOR, FNTC, EU DLT Task Force, FuturICT 2.0, France Stratégie, 
etc.), is a DLT (Distributed Ledger Technology) expert consultant for the French Tax Collection 
Agency and the Legal High Committee for Financial Markets of Paris (HCJP) and is an honorary 
member of Cercle Turgot, a French financial think tank.

SERIAL BLOCKCHAIN ENTREPRENEUR



71

Eddy TRAVIA,

Eddy Travia is a pioneer investor in blockchain technology startups and the CEO of  
Coinsilium, a London-based investment company that finances and manages the 
development of early-stage blockchain technology ventures. Coinsilium shares are quoted 
on NEX Exchange in London (NEX: COIN).
 
In July 2013, Eddy co-founded Seedcoin, the world’s first global incubator of Bitcoin startups 
and, in May 2014, is named among the ‘Top three Most Influential Investors’ at the Blockchain 
Awards along with Marc Andreessen and Roger Ver.
 
Eddy has led early-stage investments in 17 blockchain companies around the world, including 
Factom, RSK, SatoshiPay, CoinDash and Indorse.
 
An early believer in the impact of blockchain technologies, Eddy delivers keynote speeches 
around the world, advises corporates, and helps blockchain entrepreneurs to fund and grow 
their ventures.

https://uk.linkedin.com/in/startupeddy

https://www.facebook.com/StartupEddy/

https://twitter.com/startupeddy

PIONNER INVESTOR  
IN BLOCKCHAIN

CEO and Co-founder of Coinsilium
Co-founder at Block Chain Space



72

William MOUGAYAR,

As a long time industry insider, William Mougayar is a prolific researcher, writer and theorist 
who has been described as the most sophisticated blockchain business thinker. His views 
and insights are well respected worldwide.

William is a direct participant in the crypto-technology market, working alongside 
startups, entrepreneurs, pioneers, leaders, innovators, creators, enterprise executives and 
practitioners; in addition to being an investor, advisor, and Board member in some of the 
leading organizations in this space.

William is the General Partner at Virtual Capital Ventures, an early stage venture capital 
fund, and currently on the Board of Directors of OB1, the OpenBazaar open source protocol 
that is pioneering decentralized peer-to-peer commerce, a Board Advisor to the Ethereum 
Foundation, a member of OMERS Ventures Board of Advisors, an Advisory Board member to 
the Coin Center and Bloq, and founder of Startup Management.

Previously, he held senior level positions at Hewlett-Packard, Cognizant and Aberdeen Group, 
and he founded 3 startups, CYBERManagement, Eqentia, and Engagio.

William is a graduate of the University of Washington, the University of Western Ontario Ivey 
School of Business, and attended the University of British Columbia Graduate Commerce 
School. 

Contact:  wmougayar@gmail.com    

Twitter: @wmougayar

Blog: http://startupmanagement.org/blog/    

Book site: http://thebusinessblockchain.com/

AUTHOR AT THE  
BUSINESS BLOCKCHAIN

Former advisor board member, 
Ethereum Foundation



73

Dominik ZYNIS,

Dominik leads the public relations and communications effort 
for the WINGS Foundation, a Swiss non-profit focused on 
decentralized finance and governance systems. 

Previously, he worked with Omni (MastercoinFfoundation) as Head of Communications and 
Business Development. Prior to his focus on decentralized systems Dominik was responsible 
for channel sales at eMeter (Siemens), and sales at Oracle. He was Co-Founder and Chief 
Evangelist at State Software which marketed the first JSON libraries. 

Dominik has a B.A. (Economics) from Middlebury College, and unfinished MSc (Industrial 
Management) from the Blekinge Institute of Technology. He is driven by the idea that access 
to markets and financial inclusion are a corner-stone of democracy.

WINGS COFOUNDER

Fabrice CROISEAUX ,

A graduate of the prestigious Centrale Lyon engineering school and the HEC business school, 
Fabrice CROISEAUX is the CEO of InTech, a subsidiary of POST Luxembourg specializing in 
Information Systems and specific development consulting.

Passionate about digital culture and innovation, he advices his customers on how to use 
emerging technologies to create breakthrough innovations. He is the facilitator of the 
blockchain working group of the Federation of Trusted Third Parties (FNTC) and the Chairman 
of the Infrachain Board of Directors in Luxembourg. With InTech, Fabrice has participated in 
several large-scale blockchain technology projects in France and in Luxembourg, including 
FundsDLT which executed the first true purchase of financial assets using blockchain 
technology.

CEO - INTECH SA

Chairman of the Board  
of Directors - Infrachain



74

RICHARD G. KASTELEIN,

Founder of Blockchain News, partner at CryptoAsset Design Group, director of Blockchain 
Partners and event founder at CryptoFinancing - Richard Kastelein is an award-winning 
publisher, innovation executive and entrepreneur. He’s written over 1200 articles on Blockchain 
technology and startups at Blockchain News and has also published pioneering articles on 
ICOs in Harvard Business Review and Venturebeat. 

Kastelein has spoken (keynotes & panels) on Blockchain in Amsterdam, Antwerp, Barcelona, 
Beijing, Brussels, Bucharest, Dubai, Eindhoven, Gdansk, Groningen, the Hague, Helsinki, 
London, Manchester, Minsk, Nairobi, Nanchang, San Mateo, Shanghai, and Tel Aviv. 

He is a Canadian (Dutch/Irish/English/Métis) whose writing career has ranged from the 
Canadian Native Press (Arctic) to the Caribbean & Europe. He’s written occasionally for 
Harvard Business Review, Wired Insights, Guardian and Virgin.com and his work and ideas 
have been translated into Dutch, Greek, Polish, German and French.

In his 20s, he sailed around the world on small yachts and wrote, «The Hitchhiker’s Guide to 
the Seas’ travelling by hitching rides on yachts (1989).

PUBLISHER AND FOUNDER  
AT THE BLOCKCHAIN NEWS

Partner at CryptoAssets Design Group
Director at Blockchain Partners



75

Jeremy EPSTEIN,

Jeremy Epstein, CEO of Never Stop Marketing, has 20 years 
of international marketing experience in helping to bring 
innovative technologies into the mainstream. Most recently, 

Jeremy was VP, Marketing at Sprinklr which grew from a $20 million valuation and 30 people 
to $1.3 billion valuation and 900 people in 3 years.
Previous work experience includes Microsoft and consulting to startups, mid-market firms, 
and enterprises, including JNJ, Yes To Carrots, and two NY Times best-selling authors (Dan 
Pink and Gretchen Rubin). Jeremy also spent 3 years living and working in Frankfurt, Germany 
and Tokyo, Japan.
Jeremy is the author of numerous whitepapers and a book, appropriately titled, “It’s ALL on 
the Blog, DON’T Buy the Book,” and has presented to hundreds of audiences in 15 countries. 
Jeremy has been the top-ranked speaker at multiple conferences including Microsoft 
Worldwide Partner Conferences and Microsoft CIO summit, among others.
Jeremy currently works with some of the leading and most innovative companies in the 
blockchain/decentralization space including OB1, OpenBazaar, and Storj. He also facilitates 
the Decentralized Marketing Network, a peer-to-peer network for startups looking to disrupt 
major industries. In December of 2016, he edited and published a collaborative eBook with 33 
of the biggest influencers and thought-leaders called “Blockchains in the Mainstream: When 
Will Everyone Else Know?”
Jeremy takes great joy in being an early adopter of new technologies, celebrating the victories 
(like buying Bitcoin at $80) and the defeats (too many to list) equally.
Described by more than one client as a “shot of marketing espresso,” Jeremy discovered his 
calling for marketing while living in Tokyo in 1997 after reading Peppers and Rodgers «The 1:1 
Future» and hasn’t looked back since.
Jeremy was a History major at Johns Hopkins, a skill which he wholeheartedly believes 
prepared him for the marketing profession.
By far, the toughest and most rewarding job he has is to be a kind, thoughtful, and sensitive 
husband to his wife of 16 years and a patient father of 3 kids on the precipice of being teenagers.
You can connect with him on LinkedIn or Twitter.

CEO @ NEVER STOP MARKETING



76

Simon POLROT,

Simon Polrot is a senior associate in the tax team in the Paris office, mainly focusing on 
corporate and international tax.

Simon is also a leading expert in Blockchain and a Key Contact at the firm for all related topics. 
He advises on its legal implications and potential impact - not just on the financial sector - but 
also real estate, energy, healthcare and beyond.

Simon has assisted clients on issues such as the legal status and tax regime of cryptocurrencies 
and crypto-assets amid EU financial regulations; Initial Coin Offering (ICO); opposability or 
inscriptions and rule of evidence using blockchain technology and smart-contract use-cases 
(agreements, DAOs, dApps, etc).

He is regularly quoted on blockchain in the French national press, notably Les Echos and La 
Tribune, and in specialist technology publications. 
Within the blockchain community, he is founder of the information website ethereum-france.
com and co-founder of AssEth and ChainTech.

Simon holds a degree in Tax Law from the Paris-I Sorbonne University and was admitted to 
the Paris Bar in 2014. Before joining the firm, he worked for three years in the international tax 
department of a Big Four.

LEGAL ADVISOR

Lawyer at Fieldfisher,  
blockchain specialist,  
Ethereum France co-founder & VP



77

Hubert de VAUPLANE,

A partner at an American law firm, Hubert de Vauplane has worked for more than 30 years in 
the banking and financial sector, both as counsel and as a trader. Before becoming a member 
of the Paris Bar in September 2011, he was the Legal Manager of the financing and investment 
business at BNP Paribas, then the Legal and Compliance Manager at Crédit Agricole. 

He was professor at the University of Panthéon - Assas for 18 years, and today teaches at the 
Sciences Po Paris Law School. He is or has been an expert for the AMF [The French Financial 
Markets Regulator], the European Commission, the Bank of England and the European 
Central Bank.
A regular writer for the Banque journal, he is also co-authored with Jean-Pierre Bornet the 
traité de Droit des marchés financiers which, in 1999, was awarded a prize by the French 
Academy of Moral and Political Sciences. 

LEGAL ADVISOR

Partner at Kramer-Levin (Financial and Banking law, 
Alternative Financing, Asset Management, Digital Payment), 
former Group General Counsel, Legal and 
Compliance, at Credit Agricole Bank



78

Vidal CHRIQUI,

Vidal Chriqui is a Big Data (Hadoop) and distributed systems technical expert which led him 
to become interested very early on in decentralized networks, and in particular Bitcoin, then 
Ethereum.
He launched the first free French-speaking web series (10 hours of exclusive lessons and 
interviews) called Blockchain Revolution.

Vidal has participated in a lot of ‘blockchain’ experiments with both large corporations and 
startups and has developed expertise in micropayment channels.

He regularly speaks in public conferences in order to evangelize Bitcoin and more generally 
open distributed registry protocols.

Finally, Vidal is passionate about the innovation and development mechanisms of startups. 
This is what pushed him to teach himself and broaden his knowledge of the Lean Startup 
methodology in order to coach startup companies both in France and abroad.
You can follow his news on: 

https://twitter.com/vidal007

https://fr.linkedin.com/in/vidal-chriqui

https://www.slideshare.net/vchriqui/presentations

BLOCKCHAIN TECHNICAL EXPERT



79

Nicolas COURTOIS,
CRYPTOLOGIST, SENIOR LECTUROR
AT UNIVERSITY COLLEGE LONDON

Nicolas Courtois is a Senior Lecturer at University College London where he teaches about 
applied cryptography GA12 and cryptanalysis GA18. His research focuses on the security 
analysis of cryptographic systems with particular focus on realistic attack scenarios and 
systems used by millions of users every day. His Google scholar profile lists more than 100 
papers with 7100 citations in cryptography and his H-index is 36. A university team lead by 
Nicolas Courtois was given the UK University Cipher Champion in March 2013. Founding 
member of the group Code-Breakers at LinkedIn. Member of Editorial board of Cryptologia. 
Previously he was a crypto research engineer at Gemalto, the world’s largest manufacturer of 
smart cards and secure hardware. He has filed more than 10 patents on practical applications 
of cryptography. He is an expert on security engineering, electronic payment and crypto 
currency. 

https://blog.bettercrypto.com



80

Sébastien BOURGUIGNON,

Sébastien Bourguignon est manager au sein d’un cabinet de conseil en IT et il est expert 
du numérique et de la blockchain. Passionné par le digital, l’innovation et les startups, 
il a créé un blog pour y partager l’actualité autour de ces thématiques et il a développé le 
projet #PortraitDeStartuper dans lequel il fait intervenir des startupers qui présentent 
leur retour d’expérience dans leur aventure entrepreneuriale. Auteur du livre blanc 
«#80PortraitDeStartuper» et du livre «Portraits de startupers - édition 2017» publié aux éditions 
Maxima, il publie régulièrement de nombreux articles sur des plateformes comme Le Cercle 
Les Echos, Siècle Digital ou encore Le Journal Du Net.

http://sebastienbourguignon.com

https://www.linkedin.com/in/sebastienbourguignon/

https://twitter.com/sebbourguignon



81

Brad YASAR,

Brad is an entrepreneur, investor, mentor, and advisor who has started and bootstrapped 
several companies from inception to maturity over the past 20 years.   Currently, Brad is the 
co-founder and Managing Partner of KrowdMentor, a strategic crowdfunding advisory firm 
focusing on ICOs, cryptocurrencies, blockchain, and token powered organizations. Previously, 
as the co-founder and COO of CrowdfundX, Brad ran all campaign delivery operations for 
more than a dozen successful equity crowdfunding campaigns, which received over $80 
million in reservations resulting in $20 million raised from over 10,000 investors in 15 months. 
Brad also serves as Board Member of Yasar Corporation where he mentored, advised and 
invested in more than 30 companies. Passionate about where the worlds of technology and 
marketing collide, Brad is frequently invited to speak at events related to entrepreneurship, 
angel investing and business strategy. Most recently, he presented at Global Crowdfunding 
Convention, Digital Hollywood, and ITU Gate Accelerator Program. A big believer in coaching 
younger generations of entrepreneurs, Brad serves as a mentor for the Pepperdine University 
Alumni Association. Brad holds a Bachelor of Arts degree in Economics and a Bachelor of 
Science degree in International Business Management (1999) from Pepperdine University 
(Malibu, California) and a Bachelor of Science degree in Applied Sciences Math (1996) from 
Académie de Grenoble (France). His charitable efforts focus on Goodwill Industries, the 
LA County Museum of Art, the Los Angeles Philharmonic and St. Jude Children’s Research 
Hospital, to name a few.Born in Turkey in 1976, Brad lived and traveled throughout Europe; 
England, France, and Greece to name a few and migrated to the United States in 1996. Brad is 
fluent in English, French, Turkish and has basic knowledge of German, Spanish, and Klingon. 
Brad currently lives in Los Angeles with his wife, Nadine, and son, Max.  

“I’m all about empowering people. Team members. Our clients. You name it. It’s my job to 
clear a path for success.”

CO-FOUNDER & MANAGING PARTNER



82

Mike COSTACHE,

Mike never liked being put in a box so he spent the last 20 years as an entrepreneur, investment 
banker, author, professor, speaker, angel investor and fundraiser for various charities. 
Currently, Mike is a Managing Partner at KrowdMentor, a strategic investment and advisory 
firm empowering blockchain startups, funds and entrepreneurs to reach their funding and 
liquidity goals. Mike is also the founder of the Blockchain Investors Consortium (BIC) and 
serves on the Advisory Board of Token-as-a-Service (TaaS), the first ever tokenized closed-
end fund dedicated to investments in blockchain assets.  Since 2011, Mike is a member of 
Tech Coast Angels (TCA), a network of 330 angel investors in Southern California who have 
invested $185 million in 300+ deals and raised over $1.5 billion from VCs. From 2006 to 2011, 
Mike was the President of Leo & Leo, which represented brands such as Maserati, Segway, 
NetJets, PrivatSea, Sunseeker Yachts, NetSuite, Marsh, Orgil Greenhouses, Miss Universe, 
and Rockstar Energy Drink. Total sales amounted to €60 million. From 2000 to 2006, Mike 
served as founding CEO of Pioneer TeleCare, an e-commerce firm with total revenues of $4 
million. From 1998 to 2003, Mike was an Associate at WestPark Capital, The Interlink Group, 
Millennium Capital Partners, all LA-based i-banks. Mike holds a degree in Economics (1999) 
from Pepperdine University (Malibu, California), a Certificate in Negotiations, Arbitration, 
and Mediation (2003) from Pepperdine’s School of Law and has completed the Program on 
Negotiations for Senior Executives (2008) at Harvard. Born in Romania in 1977, Mike migrated 
to Israel in 1988 and in 1992 to the United States. Mike is fluent in English, Hebrew, Romanian 
and has basic knowledge of French. Mike was featured in USA Today, Wall Street Journal, 
Inc., Entrepreneur, CCTV, Business Week, Men’s Health, Top Gear and numerous other media 
outlets.

«Fridays always become Mondays and Mondays will always become Fridays...I am a TNT 
person (Today Not Tomorrow) so don’t complain if I push our limits once we join forces for 
the greater good of many.»

CO-FOUNDER & MANAGING PARTNER



83

Eric GU,

DomRaider is a hyper growth startup. We are specialized in drop-catching, a technique 
developed to catch expired domain names. 

Let me share a few numbers with you: 
• Our team has tripled in one year  
• This is spread over 3 countries, soon expanding to 5  
• We’ve carried out more than 20.000 transactions, building an impressive customer base
• We are accredited by international registries for 27 extensions  
• We secured 4M$ in funding  

Our business is auction based and today, we would like to introduce the DomRaider network. 
It’s an open source blockchain for decentralized real-time auctionsThe blockchain will be 
transparent, reliable, scalable and interoperable - without compromising on speed.  The 
DomRaider network will be the core of a complete new auctioning ecosystem. This network will 
provide an innovative solution for all worldwide auctioning players. Live auctioneers, escrow, 
appraisal experts, delivery services, online auctions providers and mobile apps developers... 
will all be able to join the network, provide their services and add value to the blockchain. 
For several months now, new kinds of public offerings have been appeared. They carry out 
fundraising in the form of cryptocurrency, like bitcoin or ether. They are called Initial Coin 
Offering, referring to an IPO (Initial Public Offering). These operations are a method of rapid 
financing for entrepreneurs in the world of blockchain. They allow them to test their project/
ideas on a community of experts.  These fundraisings are attracting more and more investors 
in search of financial gains, without always understanding the technological specifities of the 
project.

FOUNDER AND CEO OF METAVERSE 
CHAIRMAN OF METAVERSE FOUNDATION 
VICE PRESIDENT OF SHANGHAI 
INFORMATIZATION ASSOCIATION



84 Our partners



85

Underlying assumptions of this financial  
forecast

• Token Sales (ICO): sales of 350,000,000 tokens at 0,10€ / token, averaging an agreed 
average discount percentage of 20%, that is, an overall sale value of 28,000,000€

• Token Sales (Stock): sale of 500,000,000 tokens over 40 months, that is, a spread 
twice the length of that permitted. The overall sale value of the tokens is 1,250,000€ 

NB: this does not take into account sales or commissions resulting from third party use of 
our “Blockchain auctions” solution. 

• Expenses associated with setting up the ICO:

• 1,000,000€ for the total amount of all expenses associated with setting up of this 
operation (principally marketing/communication/press relation expenses)

• 280,000€ for commissions to intermediaries 

• Buyback program: 500,000€ per month from November 2017

• Development of our community (promotions, bounty, incentives, partnerships, etc.): 
250,000€ per month from November 2017

Impact of the ICO on our business activity (turnover):

Additional expenses: 

Financial considerations



86

• Risk provision (exchange / illiquidity risks) to the sum of 22,400,000€ that is 80% of 
overall sales 

• Reversal of these provisions over the 4 years following the sale at 25% per year 
(5,950,000€ / year).

• Acquisition of an LBO company (April 2018)

• Financial operation: 

• Purchase price and expenses: 20,000,000€

• LBO with 25% capital contribution (that is 5,000,000€) and 75% bank 
financing (15,000,000€) by means of a 6 year loan at 2.5%/year

• Target activity:

• Turnover: 30,000,000€

• Gross profit: 10%

• 3% annual turnover growth

• Development of our “Blockchain auction” solution (Intangible assets amortized 
over 3 years):

• At 300,000€ per month during the 1st year 

• At 200,000€ per month during the 2nd year 

• At 100,000€ per month from the 3rd year

NB : these developments are likely to lead to tax reductions (Research Tax Credit) or to increased activity (capitalized 
production) as well as to appreciably improve the company’s accounting position. As a precaution, these elements have 
not been taken into account in the attached forecasts. 

Other expenses and products:

Investments:



87

BALANCE SHEET ASSETS

BALANCE SHEET LIABILITIES

BALANCE	SHEET	ASSETS	
Heading 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 

Subscribed capital      

Fixed asset      

Intangible assets 3 500 000 4 633 333 3 800 000 2 666 667 1 133 333 

Tangible assets 48 750 114 792 91 458 58 542 45 000 

Financial assets  20 000 000 20 000 000 20 000 000 20 000 000 

Total fixed asset 3 548 750 24 748 125 23 891 458 22 725 208 21 178 333 

Current assets      

Inventories and works-in-progress 34 124 89 202 174 276 362 172 668 737 

Provider advances and prepayments     4 

Client receivables 23 967 622 24 881 808 18 264 263 8 588 308 11 674 408 

Other receivables 629 156 285 571 108 814 141 125 238 834 

Transferable securities      

Liquid assets 7 315 455 5 440 097 9 082 933 26 594 403 34 227 262 

Prepaid expenses      

Deferred charges      

Total current assets 31 946 357 30 696 677 27 630 285 35 686 007 46 809 244 

Total assets 35 495 107 55 444 802 51 521 743 58 411 216 67 987 577 

	

	 	

	

BALANCE	SHEET	LIABILITIES	
Heading 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 

Equity      

Share capital 2 011 713 2 011 713 2 011 713 2 011 713 2 011 713 

Reserves + Retained earnings  2 721 994 10 130 721 18 380 569 31 365 368 

Result for the financial year 2 721 994 7 408 727 8 249 849 12 984 799 18 430 482 

Investment subsidy      

Total Equity 4 733 707 12 142 434 20 392 282 33 377 081 51 807 564 

Provisions for risks and charges 23 800 000 17 850 000 11 900 000 5 950 000  

Debts      

Borrowings 1 572 186 15 971 234 13 281 719 10 396 596 7 388 771 

Current accounts (500 417) (500 417) (500 417) (500 417) (500 417) 

Bank borrowings      

Received client advances and prepayments       

Provider debts 1 041 164 4 939 122 4 292 298 4 668 048 5 259 271 

Tax and social debts 1 392 467 2 498 429 643 860 2 647 908 3 072 389 

Fixed asset debts 3 456 000 2 544 000 1 512 000 1 872 000 960 000 

Other debts      

Deferred income      

Conversion differences      

Total Debts 6 961 400 25 452 369 19 229 461 19 084 135 16 180 014 

Total Liabilities 35 495 107 55 444 802 51 521 743 58 411 216 67 987 577 

	

	 	

All figures are expressed in EUR



88

	

INTERIM	MANAGEMENT	BALANCES	
Heading 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 

Sales of goods      

Purchase cost of goods sold       

Sales margin      

Sold production  33 076 449 44 981 217 55 192 030 69 681 921 88 287 203 

Stored production  34 124 55 079 85 074 187 896 306 565 

Capitalized production       

Production for the accounting year 33 110 573 45 036 296 55 277 104 69 869 817 88 593 768 

Turnover 33 076 449 44 981 217 55 192 030 69 681 921 88 287 203 

Purchase cost of raw materials 178 165 23 887 897 29 272 389 31 874 201 36 205 516 

Production margin 32 932 407 21 148 399 26 004 715 37 995 616 52 388 252 

Total margin 32 932 407 21 148 399 26 004 715 37 995 616 52 388 252 

Consumables 43 400 64 800 83 200 83 200 83 200 

External services 3 496 144 10 534 640 12 065 337 15 087 806 21 014 918 

Surplus value 29 392 863 10 548 959 13 856 179 22 824 610 31 290 134 

Operating subsidies      

Taxes, duties and similar payments 48 821 108 585 135 990 165 221 197 379 

Personnel expenses 1 319 884 2 634 262 3 338 869 3 442 309 3 601 283 

Gross operating surplus 28 024 158 7 806 112 10 381 319 19 217 081 27 491 472 

Depreciation write-backs      

Other operating revenue      

Other operating expenses      

Depreciation allowances and provisions 108 750 2 308 125 3 601 667 5 406 250 5 586 875 

Operating income 27 915 408 5 497 987 6 779 653 13 810 831 21 904 597 

Financial products      

Financial expenses 43 102 345 933 365 979 295 086 220 736 

Financial result (43 102) (345 933) (365 979) (295 086) (220 736) 

Current income 27 872 306 5 152 054 6 413 674 13 515 745 21 683 861 

Extraordinary income  5 950 000 5 950 000 5 950 000 5 950 000 

Extraordinary expenses 23 800 000     

Extraordinary result (23 800 
000) 

5 950 000 5 950 000 5 950 000 5 950 000 

Pretax result 4 072 306 11 102 054 12 363 674 19 465 745 27 633 861 

Employee participation      

Corporate tax 1 350 312 3 693 327 4 113 825 6 480 946 9 203 379 

Result for the financial year 2 721 994 7 408 726 8 249 849 12 984 799 18 430 482 

Self-financing capacity 26 630 744 3 766 851 5 901 515 12 441 049 18 067 357 

	

INTERIM MANAGEMENT BALANCES

All figures are expressed in EUR



89

DETAILED	INTERIM	MANAGEMENT	BALANCES	
Heading 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 

Sales of goods      

Purchase cost of goods sold      

Sales margin      

Sold production  33 076 449 44 981 217 55 192 030 69 681 921 88 287 203 

      .fr 687 865 883 773 1 120 837 1 421 484 1 802 795 

      .be 7 226 66 576 153 184 194 353 246 487 

      .nl 10 418 95 984 382 047 1 256 366 1 776 866 

      .eu  35 479 170 672 679 335 1 816 375 

      .de 10 418 95 984 382 047 1 520 667 3 544 272 

      .at 15 802 90 385 199 691 251 504 398 968 

      .se 12 504 80 557 320 637 626 660 794 757 

      .cz 9 379 60 417 218 107 332 127 421 218 

      .pl 750 33 735 135 243 293 226 371 645 

      .ch 1 000 44 980 180 322 348 886 442 471 

      .uk 10 418 95 984 382 047 1 520 667 3 774 955 

      .it 15 802 90 385 359 754 1 123 362 1 545 029 

      .pt  24 546 45 328 57 488 72 909 

      .es 750 33 735 135 243 529 335 946 747 

      .in  29 551 120 537 275 075 348 494 

      .me 23 702 123 032 187 572 237 888 301 700 

      .ru  33 537 143 240 570 136 1 592 324 

      .br  7 175 53 847 214 330 548 317 

      .au  15 802 90 385 351 212 597 834 

      .ar  7 175 53 347 214 330 431 677 

      .ca 4 611 57 033 227 004 423 928 537 643 

      .cn  24 126 116 059 461 948 1 838 684 

      .xyz  9 565 71 798 285 773 1 002 191 

      .com  109 640 506 045 2 011 418 8 006 019 

      .biz  16 440 94 037 374 289 767 172 

      .net  47 303 180 371 637 770 2 255 449 

      .org  35 479 170 672 679 335 2 703 948 

      .info  23 702 135 574 539 633 1 976 779 

      Recurring revenue 15 804 142 725 776 689 3 177 311 9 829 230 

      Token sales (ICO) 29 750 000     

      Token sales (STOCK) 2 500 000 15 000 000 15 000 000 15 000 000 2 500 000 

      CA sup (Acquisition LBO)  27 566 412 33 079 694 34 072 085 35 094 248 

Stored production 34 124 55 079 85 074 187 896 306 565 

Capitalized production       

Production for the accounting year 33 110 573 45 036 296 55 277 104 69 869 817 88 593 768 

DETAILED INTERIM MANAGEMENT BALANCES

All figures are expressed in EUR



90

Heading 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 
Production for the accounting year 33 110 573 45 036 296 55 277 104 69 869 817 88 593 768 

Turnover 33 076 449 44 981 217 55 192 030 69 681 921 88 287 203 

Purchase cost of raw materials 178 165 23 887 897 29 272 389 31 874 201 36 205 516 

      .fr 142 159 132 441 145 994 156 559 162 340 

      .be 1 734 8 279 16 762 20 121 22 966 

      .nl 1 077 8 737 26 955 75 868 88 955 

      .eu  3 241 13 793 47 949 109 597 

      .de 746 5 802 15 345 53 445 106 594 

      .at 4 280 19 369 34 372 37 820 56 279 

      .se 5 668 29 256 99 591 165 824 158 819 

      .cz 2 983 14 220 44 612 56 825 54 721 

      .pl 248 8 766 27 669 53 553 52 013 

      .ch 213 8 327 27 522 45 752 44 229 

      .uk 1 300 9 717 32 798 107 310 227 698 

      .it 3 015 13 754 43 763 113 489 139 453 

      .pt  10 473 14 755 16 171 17 554 

      .es 248 9 132 30 523 102 816 143 048 

      .in  9 565 26 977 50 203 55 926 

      .me 7 822 39 029 40 703 42 866 48 417 

      .ru  8 183 26 189 87 014 193 190 

      .br  2 368 13 268 46 132 94 580 

      .au  3 913 16 539 53 592 72 121 

      .ar  2 368 13 143 43 868 74 250 

      .ca 1 142 14 042 41 299 64 157 70 030 

      .cn  5 974 21 184 70 502 242 707 

      .xyz  2 369 13 179 43 615 132 179 

      .com  12 282 46 046 162 452 565 082 

      .biz  4 071 15 245 53 272 92 854 

      .net  7 972 25 488 84 159 274 409 

      .org  5 588 18 923 68 753 218 294 

      .info  7 256 29 002 99 194 301 501 

      Recurring revenue 5 531 49 954 233 007 889 647 2 555 600 

      Supplementary turnover (LBO acquisition)  23 431 450 28 117 740 28 961 272 29 830 111 

Sub-contracting      

Production margin 32 932 407 21 148 399 26 004 715 37 995 616 52 388 252 

Total margin 32 932 407 21 148 399 26 004 715 37 995 616 52 388 252 

Consumables 43 400 64 800 83 200 83 200 83 200 

      Maintenance products 4 400 8 800 13 200 13 200 13 200 

      Consumables 5 000 8 000 10 000 10 000 10 000 

      Light and water 15 000 20 000 24 000 24 000 24 000 

All figures are expressed in EUR



91

Heading 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 
      Maintenance and small equipment  10 000 15 000 20 000 20 000 20 000 

      Administration supplies 5 000 7 000 8 000 8 000 8 000 

      Other materials and supplies 4 000 6 000 8 000 8 000 8 000 

External services 3 496 144 10 534 640 12 065 337 15 087 806 21 014 918 

      Property rentals 13B & 22AT 48 400 64 006 96 000 144 000 144 000 

      Overseas property rentals 48 600 207 000 298 800 302 400 302 400 

      Rental and co-property charges 14 000 15 000 16 000 25 000 25 000 

      Insurance premiums 12 397 30 185 71 123 206 098 506 930 

      Studies and research 12 000 15 000 18 000 24 000 24 000 

      Documentation 2 000 3 000 4 000 5 000 5 000 

      Publicity / Marketing 41 322 120 740 355 617 1 030 492 2 534 648 

      PUB / MKG LAUNCH 150 000 300 000 500 000 500 000 500 000 

      Payments and fees for intermediaries 24 000 36 000 48 000 48 000 48 000 

      Travel and transportation 35 000 45 000 60 000 60 000 60 000 

      Entertainment 20 000 30 000 35 000 40 000 40 000 

      Postage costs 3 000 5 000 5 000 5 000 5 000 

      Telecommunications 3 000 5 000 5 000 5 000 5 000 

      Banking services 4 132 9 659 21 337 41 220 76 039 

      Consultancy and services (extra cost USA) 46 110 144 799 394 111 933 275 1 624 701 

      Various external services 15 000 20 000 25 000 25 000 25 000 

      VIE CCi and BF coaching services 40 500 172 500 249 000 252 000 252 000 

      Accreditations  165 290 241 481 711 234 2 060 984 5 069 296 

      Qualification costs 24 793 60 370 142 247 370 977 760 394 

      ICO costs 1 000 000     

      INTRODUCER FEES 280 000     

      TOKEN BUY BACK 1 000 000 6 000 000 6 000 000 6 000 000 6 000 000 

      COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT 500 000 3 000 000 3 000 000 3 000 000 3 000 000 

      Loan insurance 6 600 9 900 9 868 9 360 7 510 

          BPI (Innovation support) 6 000 9 000 9 000 8 650 6 975 

          BPI (EIF Innovation loan) 600 900 868 710 535 

Surplus value 29 392 863 10 548 959 13 856 179 22 824 610 31 290 134 

Operating subsidies      

Taxes, duties and similar payments 48 821 108 585 135 990 165 221 197 379 

      Taxes and duties 48 821 88 085 115 490 144 721 176 879 

          Apprenticeship tax 6 321 12 615 15 989 16 483 17 246 

          Vocational training 9 295 18 552 23 513 24 239 25 361 

          Effort construction 4 183 8 348 10 581 10 908 11 413 

          Organic 22 522 41 570 57 907 81 091 110 860 

          Real estate tax 6 500 7 000 7 500 12 000 12 000 

      IFA  20 500 20 500 20 500 20 500 

Personnel expenses 1 319 884 2 634 262 3 338 869 3 442 309 3 601 283 

All figures are expressed in EUR



92

Heading 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 
      Gross salaries 929 496 1 855 114 2 351 316 2 424 161 2 536 115 

            Corporate staff (Headquarters) 847 499 1 464 514 1 798 776 1 852 956 1 945 373 

            International staff (Headquarters) 81 997 210 600 372 540 391 205 410 742 

            VP Sales (extra cost US)  180 000 180 000 180 000 180 000 

      Social security contributions 390 388 779 148 987 553 1 018 148 1 065 168 

            Corporate staff (Headquarters) 355 950 615 096 755 486 778 242 817 057 

            International staff (Headquarters) 34 439 88 452 156 467 164 306 172 512 

            VP Sales (extra cost US)  75 600 75 600 75 600 75 600 

Gross operation surplus 28 024 158 7 806 112 10 381 319 19 217 081 27 491 472 

Depreciation write-backs & provisions      

      Provision reversals      

Charge transfers      

Other operating products      

Other operating charges      

Depreciation charges and provisions 108 750 2 308 125 3 601 667 5 406 250 5 586 875 

      Depreciation charges 108 750 2 308 125 3 601 667 5 406 250 5 586 875 

          Intangible assets 100 000 2 266 667 3 533 333 5 333 333 5 533 333 

              ICANN accreditation 2018  1 000 000    

              ICANN accreditation 2019   1 500 000   

              ICANN accreditation 2020    3 000 000  

              ICANN accreditation 2021     4 000 000 

              PUBLIC BLOCKCHAIN AUCTION 100 000 1 200 000 1 200 000 1 100 000  

              PUBLIC BLOCKCHAIN AUCTION  66 667 800 000 800 000 733 333 

              PUBLIC BLOCKCHAIN AUCTION   33 333 400 000 400 000 

              PUBLIC BLOCKCHAIN AUCTION    33 333 400 000 

          Tangible assets 8 750 41 458 68 333 72 917 53 542 

              VIE Office Materials  1 875 2 500 2 500 625  

              VIE Office Materials 2 500 5 000 5 000 2 500  

              VIE Office Materials 1 250 5 000 5 000 3 750  

              VIE Office Materials  3 333 3 333 3 333  

              VIE Office Materials  5 000 6 667 6 667 1 667 

              VIE Office Materials  1 667 3 333 3 333 1 667 

              VIE Office Materials  1 458 5 833 5 833 4 375 

              VIE Office Materials (refurb)   5 000 6 667 6 667 

              VIE Office Materials (refurb)    5 000 6 667 

              VIE Office Materials (refurb)     5 000 

              Office materials (refurb)  3 333 6 667 6 667 3 333 

              Office materials (refurb)   6 667 6 667 6 667 

              Office materials (refurb)    6 667 6 667 

              Office materials (refurb)     6 667 

              Office materials (HQ)  2 500 5 000 5 000 2 500 

All figures are expressed in EUR



93

Heading 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 
              Office materials (HQ) 1 250 1 667 1 667 417  

              Office materials (HQ) 1 250 2 500 2 500 1 250  

              Office materials (HQ) 625 2 500 2 500 1 875  

              Office materials (HQ)  5 000 5 000 5 000  

              Office materials (HQ)   1 667 1 667 1 667 

          Intangible assets production      

          Tangible assets production      

Operating income 27 915 408 5 497 987 6 779 653 13 810 831 21 904 597 

Financial products      

Financial charges 43 102 345 933 365 979 295 086 220 736 

      BPI guarantee reduction (parts 1 and 2) 22 500 22 500    

      Current account interest (5 000) (5 000) (5 000) (5 000) (5 000) 

      Loans 25 602 328 433 370 979 300 086 225 736 

Financial result (43 102) (345 933) (365 979) (295 086) (220 736) 

Current income 27 872 306 5 152 054 6 413 674 13 515 745 21 683 861 

Extraordinary products  5 950 000 5 950 000 5 950 000 5 950 000 

            Exchange / illiquidity risk  5 950 000 5 950 000 5 950 000 5 950 000 

Extraordinary costs 23 800 000     

      Reversals of provisions 23 800 000     

          Exchange / illiquidity risk 23 800 000     

Extraordinary income (23 800 
000) 

5 950 000 5 950 000 5 950 000 5 950 000 

Pretax income 4 072 306 11 102 054 12 363 674 19 465 745 27 633 861 

Employee participation      

Corporate tax 1 350 312 3 693 327 4 113 825 6 480 946 9 203 379 

Result for the financial year 2 721 994 7 408 726 8 249 849 12 984 799 18 430 482 

Self-financing Ability 26 630 744 3 766 851 5 901 515 12 441 049 18 067 357 

	
	 	

All figures are expressed in EUR



94

2016

80 846 024

70 740 271

60634 518

50 528 765

40 423 012

30 317 259

20 211 506

10 105 753

0
2017 2018 2019 2020 2021

TURNOVER DISTRIBUTION (GIS COMPARED)

Sales of goods Sold production
Sales of goods and production

All figures are expressed in EUR



95

	

PROFIT	AND	LOSS	ACCOUNT	
Heading 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 

Sales, Trade and Production 33 110 573 45 036 296 55 277 104 69 869 817 88 593 768 

Purchases consumed 178 165 23 887 897 29 272 389 31 874 201 36 205 516 

Global margin 32 932 407 21 148 399 26 004 715 37 995 616 52 388 252 

Turnover 33 076 449 44 981 217 55 192 030 69 681 921 88 287 203 

Intermediate consumption 3 539 544 10 599 440 12 148 537 15 171 006 21 098 118 

   Consumables 43 400 64 800 83 200 83 200 83 200 

   External services 3 496 144 10 534 640 12 065 337 15 087 806 21 014 918 

   Sub-contracting      

Surplus value 29 392 863 10 548 959 13 856 179 22 824 610 31 290 134 

Operating subsidies      

Taxes and duties 48 821 108 585 135 990 165 221 197 379 

Personnel expenses 1 319 884 2 634 262 3 338 869 3 442 309 3 601 283 

Gross operating surplus 28 024 158 7 806 112 10 381 319 19 217 081 27 491 472 

Reversals of provisions and transfer of charges      

Other products      

Other charges      

Depreciation allowances 108 750 2 308 125 3 601 667 5 406 250 5 586 875 

Depreciation provisions      

Operating income 27 915 408 5 497 987 6 779 653 13 810 831 21 904 597 

Financial products      

Financial expenses 43 102 345 933 365 979 295 086 220 736 

Financial result (43 102) (345 933) (365 979) (295 086) (220 736) 

Current income 27 872 306 5 152 054 6 413 674 13 515 745 21 683 861 

Extraordinary products  5 950 000 5 950 000 5 950 000 5 950 000 

Extraordinary expenses 23 800 000     

Extraordinary income (23 800 
000) 

5 950 000 5 950 000 5 950 000 5 950 000 

Employee participation      

Corporate tax 1 350 312 3 693 327 4 113 825 6 480 946 9 203 379 

Result for the financial year 2 721 994 7 408 726 8 249 849 12 984 799 18 430 482 

Self-financing ability 26 630 744 3 766 851 5 901 515 12 441 049 18 067 357 

	

	 	

PROFIT AND LOSS ACCOUNT

All figures are expressed in EUR



96

80 566 264

70 495 481

60 424 698

50 353 915

40 283 132

30 212 349

20 141 566

10 070 783

0
2017 2018 2019 2020 2021

RESULT ANALYSIS

	

WORKING	CAPITAL	REQUIREMENTS	
Heading 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 

Requirements      

Product stock      

Raw material stock      

In production 34 124 89 202 174 276 362 172 668 737 

Advances and prepayments     4 

Client receivables 23 967 622 24 881 808 18 264 263 8 588 308 11 674 408 

Other receivables 629 156 285 571 108 814 141 125 238 834 

Accruals      

Total requirements 24 630 902 25 256 581 18 547 353 9 091 604 12 581 982 

Resources      

Advances and prepayments 
received 

     

Provider debts 1 041 164 4 939 122 4 292 298 4 668 048 5 259 271 

Tax and social debts 1 392 467 2 498 429 643 860 2 647 908 3 072 389 

Other debts 3 455 583 2 543 583 1 511 583 1 871 583 959 583 

Deferred income      

Total resources 5 889 214 9 981 134 6 447 742 9 187 539 9 291 243 

Working capital 
requirements 

18 741 688 15 275 447 12 099 610 (95 934) 3 290 739 

WCR variation 18 741 688 (3 466 241) (3 175 836) (12 195 545) 3 386 673 

	

	 	

WORKING CAPITAL REQUIREMENTS

Turnover GOS (gross operating surplus)

Operating income Result for the financial year

All figures are expressed in EUR



97

2016
0

2017 2018 2019 2020 2021

OPERATING CYCLE

FINANCING TABLE
	

FINANCING	TABLE	
Heading 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 

Resources      

Capital 2 011 713     

Current accounts      

Premiums and subsidies      

Financial debts 1 650 000 16 350 000    

Profit-share reserves      

Asset disposals      

Disposal of marketable securities      

Self-financing ability 26 630 744 3 766 851 5 901 515 12 441 049 18 067 357 

Total resources 30 292 457 20 116 851 5 901 515 12 441 049 18 067 357 

Employment      

Acquisition of intangible assets 3 600 000 3 400 000 2 700 000 4 200 000 4 000 000 

Acquisition of tangible assets 57 500 107 500 45 000 40 000 40 000 

Acquisition of financial assets  20 000 000    

Acquisitions of marketable securities      

Deferred charges      

Loan repayments 77 814 1 950 951 2 689 515 2 885 123 3 007 825 

Current account repayments 500 000     

Profit-share release      

Distributed dividends / Operator deductions      

Total employment 4 235 314 25 458 451 5 434 515 7 125 123 7 047 825 

Working capital requirements variation 26 057 143 (5 341 600) 467 000 5 315 926 11 019 532 

	

	 	

Total resourcesTotal requirements
Working capital requirements

23 135 368

20 243 447

17 351 526

14 459 605

11 567 684

8 675 763

5 783 842

2 891 921

All figures are expressed in EUR



98
	

FINANCIAL	PLAN	
Heading 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 

Requirements      

Intangible assets acquisitions 3 600 000 3 400 000 2 700 000 4 200 000 4 000 000 

Tangible assets acquisitions 57 500 107 500 45 000 40 000 40 000 

Financial assets acquisitions  20 000 000    

Marketable assets acquisitions      

Working capital requirements variation 18 741 688 (3 466 241) (3 175 
836) 

(12 195 
545) 

3 386 673 

Loan repayments (capital share) 77 814 1 950 951 2 689 515 2 885 123 3 007 825 

Current account repayments 500 000     

Distributed dividends / Operator deductions      

Profit-share release      

Deferred charges      

Total requirements 22 977 002 21 992 210 2 258 679 (5 070 421) 10 434 498 

Resources      

Self-financing ability 26 630 744 3 766 851 5 901 515 12 441 049 18 067 357 

Disposal of fixed assets      

Marketable securities increase      

Capital increase 2 011 713     

Current account increase      

Investment subsidies      

Financial debt increase 1 650 000 16 350 000    

Profit-share reserve      

Total funds 30 292 457 20 116 851 5 901 515 12 441 049 18 067 357 

Annual shortfall in resources - 
requirements 

7 315 455 (1 875 359) 3 642 836 17 511 470 7 632 859 

Cumulative shortfall in resources - 
requirements 

7 315 455 5 440 096 9 082 932 26 594 403 34 227 262 

End of year cash position 7 315 455 5 440 096 9 082 932 26 594 403 34 227 262 

	

	 	

FINANCIAL PLAN

SELF-FINANCING ABILITY BY RESULT
	

SELF-FINANCING	ABILITY	BY	RESULT	
Heading 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 

Result for the financial year 2 721 994 7 408 726 8 249 849 12 984 799 18 430 482 

Operation      

+ Depreciation charges and provisions 108 750 2 308 125 3 601 667 5 406 250 5 586 875 

- Reversals of provisions      

Financial      

+ Depreciation provisions      

- Reversals of provisions      

Extraordinary      

+ Depreciation provisions 23 800 000     

- Reversals of provisions  5 950 000 5 950 000 5 950 000 5 950 000 

- Subsidies attached to expenses      

- Fixed asset transfers      

+ Fixed assets net book value      

Self-financing ability 26 630 744 3 766 851 5 901 515 12 441 049 18 067 357 

	

	 	

All figures are expressed in EUR



99

22 826 352

25 679 646

19 973 058

17 119 764

14 266 470

11 413 176

8 559 882

5 706 588

2 853 294

0
2017 2018 2019 2020 2021

SELF-FINANCING ABILITY ANALYSIS

Result for financial year Self-financing ability

All figures are expressed in EUR



100

	

INVESTMENT	TABLES	
2017 Gross value 

at opening 
Increase Reduction Gross value 

at closing 

Intangible assets  3 600 000  3 600 000 

          PUBLIC BLOCKCHAIN AUCTION  3 600 000   

Tangible assets  57 500  57 500 

          VIE Office Materials  7 500   

          VIE Office Materials  15 000   

          VIE Office Materials  15 000   

          Office Materials (HQ)  5 000   

          Office Materials (HQ)  7 500   

          Office Materials (HQ)  7 500   

Financial assets     

          Total  3 657 500  3 657 500 

     

2018 Gross value 
at opening 

Increase Reduction Gross value 
at closing 

Intangible assets 3 600 000 3 400 000  7 000 000 

          ICANN 2018 accreditation  1 000 000   

          PUBLIC BLOCKCHAIN AUCTION  2 400 000   

Tangible assets 57 500 107 500  165 000 

          VIE Office Materials  10 000   

          VIE Office Materials  20 000   

          VIE Office Materials  10 000   

          VIE Office Materials  17 500   

          Office Materials (refurb)  20 000   

          Office Materials (HQ)  15 000   

          Office Materials (HQ)  15 000   

Financial assets  20 000 000  20 000 000 

          EXTERNAL GROWTH  20 000 000   

          Total 3 657 500 23 507 500  27 165 000 

     

2019 Gross value 
at opening 

Augment. Diminut. Gross value 
at closing 

Intangible assets 7 000 000 2 700 000  9 700 000 

          ICANN 2019 accreditation  1 500 000   

          PUBLIC BLOCKCHAIN AUCTION  1 200 000   

Tangible assets 165 000 45 000  210 000 

          VIE Office Materials (refurb)  20 000   

          Office Materials (refurb)  20 000   

          Office Materials (HQ)  5 000   

INVESTMENT TABLES

All figures are expressed in EUR



101

Financial assets 20 000 000   20 000 000 

          Total 27 165 000 2 745 000  29 910 000 

     

2020 Gross value 
at opening 

Augment. Diminut. Gross value 
at closing 

Intangible assets 9 700 000 4 200 000  13 900 000 

          ICANN 2020 accreditation  3 000 000   

          PUBLIC BLOCKCHAIN AUCTION  1 200 000   

Tangible assets 210 000 40 000  250 000 

          VIE Office Materials (refurb)  20 000   

          Office Materials (refurb)  20 000   

Financial assets 20 000 000   20 000 000 

          Total 29 910 000 4 240 000  34 150 000 

     

2021 Gross value 
at opening 

Augment. Diminut. Gross value 
at closing 

Intangible assets 13 900 000 4 000 000  17 900 000 

          ICANN 2021 accreditation  4 000 000   

Tangible assets 250 000 40 000  290 000 

          VIE Office Materials (refurb)  20 000   

          Office Materials (refurb)  20 000   

Financial assets 20 000 000   20 000 000 

          Total 34 150 000 4 040 000  38 190 000 

     

	

	 	
	

BREAK-EVEN	POINT	
Heading 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 

Turnover 33 076 449 44 981 217 55 192 030 69 681 921 88 287 203 

Variable expenses 472 209 24 495 131 30 968 058 36 517 247 46 777 524 

   Purchase cost of goods sold       

   Purchase cost of raw materials  178 165 23 887 897 29 272 389 31 874 201 36 205 516 

   Variable external expenses 294 044 607 234 1 695 669 4 643 046 10 572 008 

   Other variable expenses      

   Variable personnel expenses      

Variable cost margin 32 604 240 20 486 086 24 223 972 33 164 674 41 509 679 

Fixed expenses 4 731 933 15 334 032 17 810 299 19 648 929 19 825 818 

Break-even point 4 800 466 33 668 873 40 579 081 41 284 143 42 167 660 

Levy index as a % 14 34 32 28 22 

Break-even point (in days) 52 269 265 213 172 

Safety margin 28 275 983 11 312 344 14 612 949 28 397 778 46 119 543 

Safety index 85 25 26 41 52 

Operating leverage 99 46 44 48 47 

	

	 	

BREAK-EVEN POINT

All figures are expressed in EUR



102

40 000 000€

35 000 000€

30 000 000€

25 000 000€

20 000 000€

15 000 000€

10 000 000€

5 000 000€

ja
nv

 2
01

7
m

ar
s 2

01
7

m
ai

 2
01

7
ju

il 
20

17
se

pt
 2

01
7

no
v 

20
17

ja
nv

 2
01

8
m

ar
s 2

01
8

m
ai

 2
01

8
ju

il 
20

18
se

pt
 2

01
8

no
v 

20
18

ja
nv

 2
01

9
m

ar
s 2

01
9

m
ai

 2
01

9
ju

il 
20

19
se

pt
 2

01
9

no
v 

20
19

ja
nv

 2
02

0

m
ar

s 2
02

0
m

ai
 2

02
0

ju
il 

20
20

se
pt

 2
02

0
no

v 
20

20

ja
nv

 2
02

1
m

ar
s 2

02
1

m
ai

 2
02

1
ju

il 
20

21
se

pt
 2

02
1

no
v 

20
21

0€

FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Ja
n

Ja
n

Ja
n

Ja
n

Ja
n

M
ar

M
ar

M
ar

M
ar

M
ar

Se
p

Se
p

Se
p

Se
p

Se
p

N
ovN
ov

N
ov

N
ov

N
ovJu

l

Ju
l

Ju
l

Ju
l

Ju
l

M
ay

M
ay

M
ay

M
ay

M
ay



103

An ICO inspired by the 
principles of IPO

DomRaider is a French société par actions simplifiées 
(simplified joint stock company) registered in France since 
2013. The company’s annual accounts are audited by 
KPMG, its statutory auditor.

The operation’s regulatory compliance is therefore a key 
aspect of the company.

For this groundbreaking operation, DomRaider’s adopted 
principle has been to follow as closely as possible the methods 
used for IPOs in order to put in place «good practices» similar 
to those already used in the stock market.

Maître Hubert de Vauplane, partner at Kramer Levin Naftalis 
& Frankel, and Maître Simon Polrot at the Fieldfisher law firm, 
also co-founder of Ethereum France, counsel DomRaider in 
their capacity as experts in the legal, regulatory and tax issues 
relating to blockchains.
 
While this does not involve the sale of securities or financial 
instruments, the documentation embraces the principles of 
stock market regulations in order to ensure that subscribers 
understand the risks associated with this operation, as 
required by said stock market regulations.

  >  Informal contacts have also been made with certain French 
regulators so as to present them with the operation.



104

A major operation

are mobilized to carry out the DomRaider ICO, half of whom work 
directly at DomRaider headquarters

are represented in our team in order to ensure the operation’s 
translation together with full business and community relations in 
as many languages

that includes a large-scale media and press plan

from the international community and the DomRaider client 
network are expected to participate

10

80

7

10K

$1M

have indicated their desire to participate in the operation before 
the pre-sale phase dedicated to key accounts

INTERNATIONNAL
INVESTORS

PEOPLE

NATIONALITIES

SUPPORTERS 

BUDGET



105

General terms and conditions of sale

These General Terms and Conditions of Sale («GTC») are entered into between the Company 
DomRaider, 22 Allée Alan Turing, 63000 CLERMONT-FERRAND, France, with a Share Capital of 
€ 23,426, registered in the Clermont-Ferrand Trade and Companies Register under number 
794 171 140 (represented by its chairman, SARL INOVAA (itself represented by its manager, 
Mr. Tristan COLOMBET) duly authorized for the purposes herein, hereafter referred to as «the 
Company», and the natural or legal person purchasing the Company’s products or services, 
hereafter referred to as the «Buyer» or  «Client».

These GTC apply fully and automatically to all the products and services offered for sale by 
DomRaider as part of the commercial operation entitled «DOMRAIDER ICO» (the «Commercial 
Operation») towards its Clients.

These terms and conditions do not apply to other products and services marketed by 
DomRaider, concerning domain name reservations in particular. Please refer to the specific 
terms and conditions for each product, available on the corresponding website

The GTC form a contract between the Client and DomRaider for the purposes of the 
Commercial Operation. By clicking on «I hereby certify that I have read and expressly accept 
the present General Terms and Conditions of Sale», the Client accepts and acknowledges 
that they are entering into a binding contract with DomRaider and agrees to abide by it. To 
accept the General Terms and Conditions of Sale, click on «I hereby certify that I have read 
and expressly accept the present General Terms and Conditions of Sale».

These terms and conditions form the basis for the sales negotiation. They prevail over all 
other documents issued either by the Client (e.g. GPC, Charters, etc.), or by DomRaider (e.g. 
correspondence) and, as from their date of entry into force, shall apply to all purchases, 
including outstanding orders, and are deemed to be unconditionally accepted by the Client 
as of the conclusion of an order. Any derogation from the GTC herewith will require the 
express agreement of both Parties. Any other document (e.g. sales prospectus, quotation, 
presentation, etc.) is therefore given for information only and shall not constitute a contract 
document that commits the liability of DomRaider, which may therefore withdraw or modify 
such documents, without entitling the client to any compensation. These points are a key 
factor for DomRaider’s consent.



106 Website

All the details on the Commercial Operation are available on the website  
https://www.domraider.io/ 

DomRaider reserves the right, with no prior notice, to:

• Modify, add or delete any content on the website excluding any binding contract items 
between DomRaider and the Client. The Client will be deemed to have accepted these 
modifications as soon as they visit and use the website following publication of said 
modifications.

• Block, limit or restrict access to the website, in whole or in part, temporarily or permanently. 
DomRaider may not be held liable for the website being unavailable or difficult to connect 
to, regardless of the consequences for the Client.

Tokens

The Commercial Operation covered herewith involves the sale of virtual tokens, referred to 
as «DomRaider Tokens» («DRT»).

The token owner is the person eligible to perform a cryptographic transaction, subject to 
approval by the Ethereum network.

These tokens will allow their owners to access the DomRaider auction network, once 
this has been designed, developed and deployed. Under no circumstances may DRTs be 
used as a method of payment or exchange for other services offered by DomRaider. The 
Company is solely responsible for deciding whether to provide the auction service to token 
owners, within the technical, legal, economic or other constraints imposed by third parties 
or by the Company itself on its operations. The Clients’ attention is therefore drawn to the 
fact that purchasing tokens does not confer automatic access to the auction service. DRTs 
may not be used before the effective creation of the DomRaider auction service.

DRTs will not be reimbursed in the event that the DomRaider Auction Service is 
not ultimately developed, or does not operate on a permanent basis. DRT owners 
acknowledge that this is a significant risk that they accept.

Tokens - role and attributes



107

The Client therefore acknowledges that they are fully aware both that the tokens are in no 
way associated with ownership rights, voting rights or dividend rights, and that they do not 
constitute shares in DomRaider or in any other comparable asset.

On concluding the Commercial Operation, these tokens will be issued by a technical 
process referred to as a «Blockchain». This is an open source IT protocol over which the 
Company has no rights or liability in terms of its development and operation. The token 
distribution mechanism will be controlled by a Smart Contract; this involves a computer 
program that can be executed on the Ethereum network or on a blockchain network that is 
compatible with Smart Contract programming language. The Tokens will meet the ‘ERC20’ 
standard (https://theethereum.wiki/w/index.php/ERC20_Token_Standard), and will be 
subject, inter alia, to the operating conditions of the Internet computer network and the 
«Ethereum» blockchain protocol. The Company has no control, right or liability over the 
operation of the protocol and the Ethereum network.

The buyer accepts and acknowledges that these tokens do not entitle their owners:

• to participate in any decision or vote within the Company

• to benefit from the Company’s results;

• to derive any economic or other gain from the Company.

Issuing tokens

The tokens will be issued by the Company or by a third party with the Company’s 
authorization. Instructions will be posted on the Commercial Operation website at  
https://www.domraider.io. The Company has no control over and may not take any action 
against blockchain technology, the Ethereum network and the protocol, or the Smart 
Contract and its code in performance mode. Therefore, DomRaider may not be held liable 
in any way for any feature that might affect the token passing scheme or ownership of the 
tokens sold, or that might hamper the client’s ability to use the tokens, including display 
of the tokens in an electronic wallet compatible with the ERC20 token standard, or the 
assignment of these tokens to a third party.



108

The acquisition of tokens by transferring tokens or crypto-currencies to the Smart Contract 
comes under the Buyer’s sole liability and will be subject to the terms and conditions of 
the protocol and the Ethereum network. As Tokens are issued under a Smart Contract, the 
Company is not obliged to reimburse or compensate in any way any Buyer whose Tokens 
have not been issued by the Smart Contract for any reason.

Once issued, the tokens may be freely assigned or transferred to third parties by the Client, 
in whole or in part, at their own initiative, in return for payment or free of charge. However, 
the Client shall be solely and fully liable for the conditions and consequences of such an 
assignment or transfer of the tokens in their possession. In particular, given that DomRaider 
will have no control over such transactions, the Client may not claim against DomRaider 
for any loss of their tokens due to any error of any kind that may occur during the transfer.



109 Information and knowledge of the 
subject by the client

By adhering to the GTC, the Client expressly acknowledges having been thoroughly 
and comprehensively informed about the Commercial Operation.

• The Client is deemed to be fully aware of all the legal norms and technical constraints 
relating to the purchase, possession and use of crypto currencies and tokens based 
on blockchain technologies, and to the auction service offered by DomRaider. 

• The Client agrees to notify DomRaider in full concerning any information 
likely to impact on their order directly or indirectly. Should the Client fail 
to do this, DomRaider may not be held liable in any way in this regard.

An order is any order relating to the services marketed on the DomRaider website and 
accepted by DomRaider (the «Order»). It is deemed to be irrevocably accepted by the Client 
as from the time DomRaider issues the order’s acknowledgment of receipt; as from this date, 
it may not be cancelled or amended without DomRaider’s express agreement, the latter 
being entitled to decide not to proceed without entitling the client to any compensation.

DomRaider also reserves the right to rectify any clerical error or omission in the contract 
documents binding it to the Client without entitling the client to any compensation.

OBLIGATIONS BINDING UPON DOMRAIDER:  DomRaider agrees to take all the necessary 
care and diligence to provide a quality service in accordance with current business practice 
and state of the art. DomRaider is solely bound by an obligation of means. In particular, 
it will not be possible to use DRTs if development of the DomRaider auction network 
is not implemented. In such a case, the DRT value would most likely be equal to zero.
 



110 Client eligibility and liability

As with the Domain Name Reservation Services offered by DomRaider, the sale of 
tokens under this Commercial Operation is reserved for experienced professionals 
who have an in-depth understanding of the nature of the product they are purchasing, 
a firm grasp of the technologies on which they are based, and who are fully aware of 
all the associated risks.

Clients seeking to buy tokens are deemed to be acting for the purposes of a professional 
business activity and not as a consumer;

The Client is solely liable for determining which legal, accounting, financial and fiscal 
conditions of any nature it is required to comply with in order to participate in the 
Commercial Operation, in accordance with the laws and regulations applicable in their 
country of residence.

DomRaider may not be held liable for the Client’s filing obligations in the country in 
which it is domiciled. The same applies to any tax or charge that would be payable 
by the Client, in relation to the purchase, ownership, use or passing of its tokens.
 

Limitations of Use
Prior to any Order, the Client acknowledges and accepts that tokens sold by 
DomRaider do not, under any circumstance, represent any form of investment or 
financial investment and agrees not to attempt to divert their function for speculative 
purposes.

• The Client also agrees not to use the ICO website, the issued tokens and, more 
generally, any content or service provided to the Client by DomRaider that does 
not comply with the objectives and methods set out in these GTC. 

• The Client agrees to respond to any specific request for information issued by 
DomRaider under the application of these terms and conditions.

• In particular, the Client agrees not to modify, interfere with, deactivate or saturate, 
nor to breach the security of or impair data integrity and confidentiality in relation 
to any service offered by DomRaider.



111 Cancellation and refund

All token Orders are deemed firm and final. No Order confirmed on the DomRaider website 
may be subsequently canceled at the Client’s request.
The Client acknowledges that they are fully aware that they will not be entitled to claim any 
full or partial reimbursement under any circumstances whatsoever.

As the sale of the proposed tokens is strictly reserved for an experienced professional 
clientele, the Client may not claim any right of return against DomRaider.

Although ownership of the tokens depends on smooth operation of the Ethereum network, 
DomRaider, which has no control over said operation, may not, under any circumstances, 
be held liable for any failure of said network that could result in the Client losing or being 
unable to use the tokens.

Guarantee

No claim may suspend payment of the Order.

As the tokens offered for sale are deemed intangible property, having no value or 
functionality other than the DomRaider service credit that they represent, no guarantee is 
attached to them following delivery. 

Software Risks

Certain platform items and features are currently under development. Accordingly, the 
Client accepts that the development is not guaranteed to succeed, that the platform is 
subject to software and technical risks and that said items and features may never be 
deployed on the platform.



112

In such a case, the announcement would be made on the DomRaider website, together 
with an email to all the clients who participated in the ICO. A minimum period of 6 months 
would be granted to token holders in order to enable them to use their remaining credit.

Tokens cannot be deleted due both to their strictly decentralized nature and to the fact 
that, once issued, they are no longer under DomRaider’s control. They would, in any case, 
remain the property of their owner. On the other hand, on expiration of the period of 
validity, they would simply be no longer accepted on DomRaider.

Any tokens not exchanged on DomRaider by this date would simply be of no more value.

Validity of tokens

The tokens’ period of validity, during which they can be used, is not time-dependent. 
However, DomRaider reserves the right to set a limit at a later date should this prove 
necessary.

Incidents, late payments, penalty clause

The Client is prohibited from any illegal practice of automatic debit or credit, here assumed 
to correspond to a non-payment or late payment. However, the Parties reserve the right to 
seek legal or contractual compensation for claims. Any delay in payment will automatically 
result in the application of a flat-rate €40 fee as from the date following the invoice’s due 
date; this fee will supplement late penalties, including the application of an interest rate 
on arrears equal to the rate applied by the ECB to its most recent refinancing operation 
plus 10 percentage points, with DomRaider being entitled to automatically demand full 
and immediate payment of the Order, all amounts owed to DomRaider becoming payable 
immediately with no prejudice to the application of the other clauses herein, while any 
discounts that may have been granted will be canceled and the full cost of the debt collection 
procedure charged to the Defaulting Client. DomRaider also reserves the right to suspend 
or cancel any Order relating to said Defaulting Client, and to accept subsequent Orders 
only if payment is made in advance. Should the Client breach any one of its obligations, 
and should formal notice issued by means of registered mail remain unsuccessful for 15 
clear days after dispatch, then, under a penalty clause, the Client will be required to pay a 
flat-rate compensation equal to one third of the total Order amount, with no prejudice to 
the application of the other clauses accepted herein.



113 Client liabilities

The Client acknowledges that they are solely liable for storage and use of the purchased 
tokens under normal conditions of use, and in accordance both with current legislation at 
the time and place of use and with their profession’s code of conduct, which they declare 
they are fully aware of.

Accordingly, they shall be deemed personally liable for any damaging consequences arising 
from the abnormal, noncompliant or unforeseeable storage, transfer or use of said tokens.

The Client also acknowledges that they have received all the necessary details from 
DomRaider on the information and data they have communicated and are therefore solely 
liable for the ordered tokens’ suitability in terms of their specific planned use.

The Client agrees to send DomRaider their correct and updated payment and personal 
details at the time of creating their client account and each time they may modify the said 
account. DomRaider reserves the right to request supporting documents from the Client to 
ensure the accuracy of the details they have supplied.

The Client will be solely and exclusively liable for the logins required to sign into the 
DomRaider website. DomRaider shall not be held liable for any illegal or fraudulent use 
of the Client’s login. The provision of logins is deemed confidential. Any suspicion of 
intentional or unintentional disclosure of the login shall engage the Client’s sole liability, 
excluding that of the company.

The Client will assume full responsibility for the consequences of any theft or misuse of 
tokens acquired as a result of any use by the members of its staff or by any person to whom 
the Client has provided their login(s). Similarly, the Client will assume full responsibility for 
the consequences of the loss of the above-mentioned login(s).



114

(a) use of services that are not compliant with the terms of the contract;

(b) non-performance, failure, malfunction or unavailability of the services due to a third 
party, the Client, a third-party product, or the Client’s breach of its obligations;

(c) indirect damages such as business loss or disturbance, loss of orders, operating 
loss, infringement of the trade mark, loss of profits or clients (e.g. improper disclosure 
of confidential information concerning said clients due to failure or piracy of the system, 
third-party proceedings against the Client, etc.)

(d) loss, disclosure or unlawful or fraudulent use of user sign-ons by the client or third 
parties;

(e)  suspension of access or temporary or permanent suspension of services (in particular, 
arising from a request issued by an appropriate administrative or judicial authority, or 
notification received from a third-party;
  
(f) loss, alteration or destruction of all or part of the content (information, data, 
applications, files or other items) hosted on the infrastructure, insofar as DomRaider 
is not responsible for managing the continuity of client activities, and data backups in 
particular; 

(g) mismatch between the services and the client’s needs (in particular, with regard to 
the sensitivity of the relevant data),

(h) security incidents relating to use of the Internet, concerning in particular the loss, 
alteration, destruction, disclosure or unauthorized access to the Client’s data or details 
on or via the Internet;

(i) damage to systems, applications and other items installed by the client on the 
infrastructure

DomRaider disclaimer 

In addition, DomRaider may not be held liable for any of the following:
 

The Client expressly acknowledges the random nature of the DomRaider auction 
network development project as presented in this document (see below for risk 
factors) and that this project, therefore, may not come to fruition or may have to be 
abandoned due to technical constraints, without the DRT tokens being used. In such 
a case, the Client expressly acknowledges and accepts as an essential condition of 
the GTC that it will not be entitled to sue or bring any direct or indirect legal action 
before the courts, the arbitration bodies or any alternative dispute settlement body, 
either in France or abroad, against DomRaider, its directors, shareholders, employees 
and subcontractors in the event of the non-performance, non-deployment or non-
implementation of the DomRaider auction network, even in cases where their DRTs 
have lost some or all of their value. 



115 Title retention clause

DomRaider retains full ownership of the ordered tokens up to full and effective payment 
of the price agreed with the Client, including the principal and other charges, any contrary 
clause being deemed unwritten. As such, DomRaider will be entitled to claim them as 
compensation for any unpaid invoices with no prejudice to its right to rescind any sales in 
progress, with the Client also agreeing to immediately notify DomRaider of any third-party 
development that would infringe DomRaider’s right of ownership. Should the tokens be 
resold before payment is complete, the sale between DomRaider and the Client will be 
automatically rescinded and the assets transferred deemed to have been sold on behalf of 
DomRaider. The enforcement of DomRaider’s right to claim is carried out without prejudice 
to any other legal and/or contractual damages or rights (e.g. compulsory execution or 
cancellation of the contract) and is made by simple registered letter sent to the Client. 
Should DomRaider decide to cancel the sale, the Client will be required to pay a lump sum 
equal to 30% of the total contract amount (principal and other charges), with DomRaider 
retaining all the amounts it has already collected.

Intellectual property, reference

The Client acknowledges that DomRaider retains sole and exclusive ownership of all 
intellectual, industrial and expertise rights relating to tokens, documents, data, etc. The 
technical and technological resources and expertise used to design both DomRaider 
tokens, and documents of any nature, shall remain the exclusive property of DomRaider 
regardless of whether they are protected under an intellectual property clause. Therefore, 
any document, listing, database, etc., in its entirety, is given to the Client in return for 
payment or free of charge solely as a loan for use that exclusively enables them to make their 
Order, under or not a separate availability and/or non-disclosure agreement that forms an 
integral part of these GTC, and may not be used by the Client for any other purpose without 
incurring their liability.



116 Cancellation

Contract completeness, waiver, interpretation

Should the Client fail to comply with any one of these clauses, DomRaider may cancel the 
sale automatically 15 full days after sending a simple notice that has remained unsuccessful, 
the said cancellation being performed with no prejudice to the other clauses herein. 
DomRaider will be entitled to declare or uphold the cancellation thus incurred despite any 
offers to pay and execute obligations that are made subsequent to the cancellation, or any 
payment or execution of obligations made after the allotted deadline.

Should any of the clauses in these GTC be declared null and void or deemed unwritten, 
all other clauses shall remain in full force and effect. DomRaider’s decision not to avail 
itself of any one of these clauses shall not be construed as a waiver of its right to apply 
the same clause at a later date. The interpretation and assessment of the validity of any 
contract is understood in accordance with the following documents, in descending order 
in the hierarchy of norms: GTC, order acknowledgment of receipt, invoice, and delivery 
notification.

Force majeure

Force majeure is deemed any event beyond the parties’ control, which they cannot 
reasonably foresee or reasonably avoid or overcome, provided that its occurrence makes 
it impossible to fulfill the obligations, and adversely affects Order execution or contract 
balance (e.g. natural cataclysm, substantial change in the price of resources, variation in 
customs duties, armed conflicts, labor disputes, changes in regulations, subcontractor 
failure, machine breakdown, etc.). The most diligent Party shall promptly notify the other 
Party by any means, and the Parties will then agree to negotiate in good faith any changes 
required to ensure the continuity of contract obligations. If, however, such impossibility 
exceeds three months, the most diligent Party may terminate the contract in writing 
without incurring its liability and without entitling the other party to claim any right of 
recourse or compensation, with DomRaider retaining previously collected amounts, which 
are irrevocably acquired.



117 Protection of personal data

The processing of personal data performed under the Service has been declared in France 
to the National Commission for Data Protection and Liberties under N° 1738136.

In accordance with Article 32 of French law N° 78-17 of 6 January 1978 relating to Information 
Technology, Files and Civil Liberties, DomRaider, which is responsible for processing the 
said data, will inform the Client that it is processing their personal data. The details entered 
by the Client on the forms available on the website are intended for authorized DomRaider 
personnel for administrative and business management purposes. These data are 
processed, firstly, to allow Clients to access and use the service and DomRaider to execute 
the service, and secondly, to prospect for new clients. Data marked with an asterisk are 
mandatory. Failure to enter such data may delay enrollment or the use of the service.

• The Client agrees and authorizes DomRaider to share its personal data with 
other Clients as well as with any trusted third party for the sole purposes of the 
service.

• The Client is also entitled to object to the processing of their personal data for 
legitimate reasons, as well as to object to the use of such data for the purposes of 
prospecting activities.

• The Client shall comply with the provisions of French law N° 78-17 of 6 January 1978 
relating to Information Technology, Files and Civil Liberties, amended, any breach 
of which is deemed a criminal offence. In particular, they shall not collect or misuse 
data and, in general, perform any act likely to infringe the privacy or reputation of 
individuals.

• The Client is entitled to access, question, modify, rectify and delete their own 
personal data.

To exercise their rights, the Client shall notify their request to DomRaider, attaching a copy 
of their signed ID document.



118 Legislative developments

Language, jurisdiction

The Client acknowledges and accepts that the DomRaider ICO operation is taking place 
within a French legal environment that is still under development. New laws or rules may 
subsequently frame, modify or clarify the practice of such operations. Where necessary, 
should legislative changes conflict with all or part of these terms and conditions, DomRaider 
reserves the right to amend the terms of the operation as appropriate, retroactively if 
necessary, in order to ensure that the operation remains legal and compliant with the 
various French regulatory bodies.

These GTC and any contract relationship relating to the products and services sold by 
DomRaider are governed exclusively by French law, DomRaider’s commitment being 
subject to this clause. Translations of the terms and conditions herein, made available to 
the Client, are purely informative and are not legally binding. The French version of these 
terms and conditions has sole legal force.

The Parties agree to seek an amicable settlement prior to bringing any legal action. Failing 
this, any dispute, of any nature whatsoever, will be brought expressly before the court 
with jurisdiction over DomRaider’s registered headquarters, as no document can effect a 
novation or waiver of this jurisdiction clause.

DomRaider will respond to any request issued via regular legal process aimed at obtaining 
specific information about the operation or its clients, particularly in terms of the fight 
against money laundering.



119

General Warning

(i) any reliance on the information contained in this 
document,
(ii) any error, omission or inaccuracy in said information, 
or
(iii) any resulting action that may be brought.

This document does not constitute an offer or an 
invitation to sell shares, securities or rights belonging 
to DomRaider or any related or associated company.

A DRT does not represent an investment 

in a security or a financial instrument within the mea-
ning of EU Directive 2014/65/EU of the European Par-
liament and of the Council of 15 May 2014 relating to 
markets in financial instruments: DRTs confer no direct 
or indirect right to DomRaider’s capital or income, nor 
does it confer any governance right within DomRaider;

None of the information or analyses described in this 
document is intended to provide a basis for an invest-
ment decision, and no specific investment recommen-
dation is made. Accordingly, this document does not 
constitute investment advice or an invitation to invest 
in any security or financial instrument of any nature 
whatsoever.
This document does not constitute or form part of, 
and should not be construed as, an offer for a sale or 
subscription, or an invitation to buy or subscribe secu-
rities or financial instruments. This document, or any of 
its component parts, does not constitute the basis for, 
or should not be used as a basis for, or in connection 
with, a contract for the sale of securities or financial ins-
truments or a commitment to sell securities or financial 
instruments of any kind.
DomRaider expressly disclaims any liability for any di-
rect or indirect loss or damage of any kind arising direc-
tly or indirectly from:



120

A DRT is not proof of ownership or a right of control

A DRT is not an electronic currency  

A DRT is not a payment service 

Control over a DRT does not grant the controlling in-
dividual any asset or share in DomRaider, or in the 
DomRaider network. A DRT does not grant any right to 
participate in control over DomRaider’s management 
or decision-making set-up, or over the DomRaider 
network.

Within the meaning of EU Directive 2009/110/EC of 
the European Parliament and of the Council of 16 Sep-
tember 2009 on the taking up, pursuit and prudential 
supervision of the business of electronic money insti-
tutions: DRTs are not accepted outside the DomRaider 
network and a DRT does not have a fixed exchange 
value equal to the amount delivered at the time of its 
issue;

Within the meaning of EU Directive (2007/64/EC) of 
13 November 2007 relating to payment services in 
the internal market, nor within the meaning of the 
(EU) Directive relating to payment services 2 (DSP 2) 
N° 2015/2366 of the European Parliament and of the 
Council of 25 November 2015: the ICO does not involve 
the purchase/sale of cryptocurrency and DomRai-
der’s business does not consist in receiving currencies 
against the delivery of cryptocurrencies.

A DomRaider Token, or «DRT», is a cryptographic 
token used by the DomRaider network. 

A DRT is a crypto-currency,  i.e. an unregulated, digital 
asset, issued and controlled by its developers, and used 
and accepted by the members of a given community.



121

Selling Restriction

Documents linked to the issue of DRTs may not be transmitted or distributed to a 
"U.S.person", to a Canadian or Singapore citizen or to a mail or email address in the 
United States of America, Canada, and Singapore. It is prohibited to transmit, distribute 
or reproduce documents linked to the issue of DRTs to or for a "U.S. person", Canadian 
or Singapore citizen, or within the territories of the United States of America, Canada 
and Singapore in whole or in part.

Participation in the ICO is reserved for natural or legal persons acting within the scope 
of their professional activities. Any private individual acting on a non-professional 
basis as a simple consumer within the meaning of EU Directive 2011/83/EU relating to 
consumer rights is excluded from the ICO.

•  Any private individual resident in the United States;

•  Any partnership or business organized or established under U.S. law;

•  Any property of which the executor or administrator is a U.S. citizen;

•  Any trust of which a proxy is an American citizen;

•  Any agency or branch of a foreign entity located in the United States;

•  Any non-discretionary account or similar account (other than a trust or property) 
held by a trader or other trustee for the benefit of or on behalf of a U.S. citizen;

•  Any discretionary account or similar account (other than a trust or trust) held by a 
trader or other trustee, that is organized, established or (if a private individual) resident in 
the United States; and

•  Any partnership or company if:

 a  It is organized or established under the law of a foreign jurisdiction; and

 b  It is formed by a U.S. citizen primarily for the purpose of investing in 
securities not  listed under the U.S. Securities Act, unless it is organized or established, and 
owned, by accredited investors who are not private individuals, trusts or properties.

To ensure their eligibility for the purchase of DRTs, the buyer declares that they are not 
a Canadian or Singapore citizen, nor a "U.S. person", (within the meaning of Regulation 
S of the Securities Act 1933 in U.S. law), i.e.: 



122

Until it is distributed to the buyer, the said buyer’s DRT may be linked to a DomRaider ac-
count. You can only access the DomRaider account using the credentials selected by the 
buyer. The loss of these credentials will result in the loss of the DRT. Good practices advise 
buyers to store their credentials securely in one or more backup locations that are geogra-
phically separated from the work location.

Both DRTs and the DomRaider network are based on the Ethereum protocol. Therefore, 
any malfunction, unplanned function or unexpected operation of the Ethereum protocol 
may cause the DomRaider network or DRTs to malfunction or operate in a way that is not 
expected. Ether, the native Ethereum Protocol account unit may itself lose value in a similar 
way to DRTs, and also in other ways.

For more information on the Ethereum protocol, see  
> http://www.ethereum.org

Risks associated with the Ethereum protocol

Risk of loss of access to a DRT due to loss of 
credentials

Any third party that obtains access to the buyer’s credentials or private keys may be able to 
use the buyer’s DRT. To minimize this risk, buyers must protect themselves against people 
gaining unauthorized access to their electronic devices.

Risks associated with the buyer’s credentials

Warnings on the risks inherent to the ICO 



123 Legal risk and risk of adverse regulatory inter-
vention in one or more jurisdictions

Risk of an alternative, unofficial DomRaider 
network

Blockchain technologies have been reviewed by various regulatory bodies around the 
world, including within the European Union. The ICO has been structured to comply with 
EU law applicable at the time of the offer.

Operation of the DomRaider network and of DRTs may be impacted by the passing of 
restrictive laws, the publication of restrictive or negative opinions, the issuing of injunctions 
by national regulators, the initiation of regulatory actions or investigations, including but 
not limited to restrictions on the use or ownership of digital tokens such as DRTs, which 
may prevent or limit development of the DomRaider network.

Given the lack of crypto-currency qualifications in most countries, each buyer is strongly 
advised to carry out a legal and tax analysis concerning the purchase and ownership of 
DRTs according to their nationality and place of residence.

 

Following pre-sale and development of the original version of the DRT platform, there is 
a possibility that alternative networks may have been established using the same open 
source code and open source protocol that underlies the DomRaider network. The official 
DomRaider network may find itself in competition with these alternative, unofficial 
networks based on DRTs, which could potentially adversely impact the DomRaider network 
and DRTs.

Risk of a lack of interest in the DomRaider 
network or distributed applications

There is a possibility that the DomRaider network may not be used by a large number 
of companies, individuals and other organizations, and that there may be limited public 
interest in the creation and development of distributed applications. Such a lack of interest 
could impact on the development of the DomRaider network and, therefore, on the uses 
or potential value of DRTs.



124 Risk that the DomRaider network, as developed, 
does not meet buyer expectations 

Risk of theft and piracy

The DomRaider network is currently under development and may undergo significant 
redesign prior to its launch. For a number of reasons, not all buyer expectations concerning 
the DomRaider network or DRT form and function may be met on the launch date, including 
changes in design, implementation and execution of the DomRaider network.

Hackers or other malicious or criminal groups or organizations may attempt to interfere 
with the DomRaider network or the availability of DRTs in several ways including, but not 
limited to, denial of service attacks, Sybil attacks, mystification, smurfing, malware attacks, 
or consensus-based attacks.

Risk of security weaknesses in the DomRaider 
network’s core infrastructure software 

Risk of weakness or exploitable breakthrough 
in the field of cryptography

The DomRaider network’s core software is based on open source software. There is a 
risk that the DomRaider team, or other third parties, may intentionally or unintentionally 
introduce weaknesses or bugs into the core infrastructure elements of the DomRaider 
network, by interfering with the use of or causing loss of DRT.

Advances in cryptography, or technical advances such as the development of quantum 
computers, may present risks for crypto-currencies and the DomRaider platform, which 
could result in the theft or loss of DRTs.



125 Risk of a DRT mining attack

Risk of the DomRaider network failing to be used 
or adopted

As with other decentralized cryptographic tokens and crypto-currencies, the blockchain 
used for the DomRaider network is vulnerable to mining attacks, including but not 
limited to, dual-expense attacks, powerful mining attacks, selfish mining attacks, and 
critical competition attacks. Any successful attack poses a risk to the DomRaider network, 
the expected performance and sequencing of DomRaider markets, and the expected 
performance and sequencing of Ethereum contract calculations. Despite the best efforts of 
the DomRaider team, the risk of known or new mining attacks exists.

While DRTs should not be considered an investment, their value is bound to change over 
time. This value may be limited if the DomRaider network is not sufficiently used and 
adopted. In such a case, there could be few or no markets at the platform launch, which 
would limit the value of DRTs.

Risk of a tight market for DRTs

Risk of an uninsured loss

There are currently no exchanges or trading facilities on which DRTs can be traded. If such 
exchanges or trading facilities do develop, they will probably be relatively new and subject 
to poorly understood regulatory oversight. They may therefore be more vulnerable to fraud 
and default than the established and regulated exchanges that exist for other products. 
Should exchanges or trading facilities that represent a substantial part of the DRT trading 
volume be involved in fraud, security failures or other operational problems, the failures of 
such exchanges or trading facilities may limit the DRT value or liquidity. 

Unlike bank accounts or accounts in other regulated financial institutions, funds held 
through the DomRaider or Ethereum network are generally uninsured. At present, there 
are no public or private insurance agents providing buyers with coverage against a loss of 
DRTs or a loss of value.



126 Risk of winding-up of the DomRaider project

Risk of malfunction in the DomRaider network

For a number of reasons including, but not limited to, an unfavorable fluctuation in Bitcoin 
value, an unfavorable fluctuation in DRT value, the failure of business relationships or 
competing intellectual property claims, the DomRaider project may no longer be a viable 
activity and may be dissolved or simply not launched.

The DomRaider network may be impacted by an adverse malfunction including, but not 
limited to, a malfunction that results in the loss of DRTs or market information.

Unforeseen risks
Crypto-currencies and cryptographic tokens are a new, untested technology. In addition to 
the risks stipulated above, there are other risks that the DomRaider team cannot predict. 
Risks may also occur as unanticipated combinations or as changes in the risks stipulated 
herein.

Know your customer procedure (KYC)

As part of the Know Your Customer procedure (KYC), anyone wishing to acquire DRTs will 
have to provide DomRaider with the following details via the dedicated ICO website prior 
to purchasing DRTs: 
• Surname and first name (for private individuals):
• Company name (for companies):
• Country of tax residence:
• Address:
• E-mail address. 



127

DomRaider, 22 Allée Alan Turing - 63000 Clermont-Ferrand - FRANCE
 SIRET 79417114000013 

www.domraider.io


